Follow-up of aortic stent grafts: comparison of the volumetric analysis of the aneurysm sac by ultrasound and CT.The long-term follow-up of patients with endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) and a normal surgical risk was defined by the French National Authority for Health (Haute Autorité de Santé) in 2009. The monitoring of the volume of the aneurysm sac theoretically avoids the bias related to the measurement of its diameter alone. The objective of this study was to evaluate how reliable and reproducible the volumetric measurement of the aneurysm sac by ultrasound was compared with computerized tomography angiography (CTA).We carried out a retrospective diagnosis study of 75 consecutive patients treated with EVAR in our institution who were monitored with 3-dimensional ultrasonography (3DU) and CTA between January 2010 and December 2012. The measurement of the volume (cm(3)) of the aneurysm sac with a Toshiba Aplio XG ultrasound system equipped with a 3-MHz 3-dimensional probe was compared with the volume obtained by CTA. Interoperator reproducibility was studied in the last 45 enrolled patients; 2 different blinded operators made 2 volumetric measurements on the same patients, on the same day. An analysis of a 48-patient subgroup in which at least two 3DU were performed during follow-up was also carried out to determine the threshold value of the increase in the volume of the aneurysm sac, making it possible to suspect the presence of an endoleak.A total of 116 pairs of examinations were compared (the patients who had the longest postoperative follow-up had 4 pairs of compared examinations). The correlation between volumetric ultrasound and CTA measurements was excellent (r = 0.931; P < 0.0001) in the 116 pairs of examinations, and so was the reproducibility of volumetric echography (r = 0.949; P < 0.0001) in 45 patients. The subgroup study highlighted the fact that a 6.5-cm(3) increase of the aneurysm sac made it possible to suspect the presence of an endoleak in comparison with CTA as the gold standard (sensitivity and specificity were 85.7% and 85.3%, respectively). The area under the curve was 0.854 (95% confidence interval, 0.793-0.915). In the 116 examinations, a good correlation between volume and diameter was calculated with CTA (r = 0.733; P < 0.0001) and between ultrasound volumetric and CTA diameter (r = 0.660; P < 0.0001).Volumetric echography is comparable with CTA for the evaluation of the aneurysm sac after EVAR, reproducible and inexpensive. When a significant increase of the volume of the sac is detected by ultrasound, the examination can be supplemented by an injection of ultrasound contrast agent or by CTA to visualize an endoleak.Duplex ultrasound imaging alone is sufficient for midterm endovascular aneurysm repair surveillance: a cost analysis study and prospective comparison with computed tomography scan.Early in our experience with endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR) we performed both serial computed tomography scans and duplex ultrasound (DU) imaging in our post-EVAR surveillance regimen. Later we conducted a prospective study with DU imaging as the sole surveillance study and determined cost savings and outcome using this strategy.From September 21, 1998, to May 30, 2008, 250 patients underwent EVAR at our hospital. Before July 1, 2004, EVAR patients underwent CT and DU imaging performed every 6 months during the first year and then annually if no problems were identified (group 1). We compared aneurysm sac size, presence of endoleak, and graft patency between the two scanning modalities. After July 1, 2004, patients underwent surveillance using DU imaging as the sole surveillance study unless a problem was detected (group 2). CT and DU imaging charges for each regimen were compared using our 2008 health system pricing and Medicare reimbursements. All DU examinations were performed in our accredited noninvasive vascular laboratory by experienced technologists. Statistical analysis was performed using Pearson correlation coefficient.DU and CT scans were equivalent in determining aneurysm sac diameter after EVAR (P < .001). DU and CT were each as likely to falsely suggest an endoleak when none existed and were as likely to miss an endoleak. Using DU imaging alone would have reduced cost of EVAR surveillance by 29% ($534,356) in group 1. Cost savings of $1595 per patient per year were realized in group 2 by eliminating CT scan surveillance. None of the group 2 patients sustained an adverse event such as rupture, graft migration, or limb occlusion as a result of having DU imaging performed as the sole follow-up modality.Surveillance of EVAR patients can be performed accurately, safely, and cost-effectively with DU as the sole imaging study.Early follow-up after endovascular aneurysm repair: is the first postoperative computed tomographic angiography scan necessary?To examine whether initial postoperative computed tomographic angiography (CTA) is needed in all patients undergoing endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).A total of 105 consecutive patients underwent EVAR with standard infrarenal devices in our department between November 2009 and May 2011. Five patients were excluded due to severe renal insufficiency, leaving 100 (85 men; median age 73 years, range 46-91) eligible for prospective enrollment in a triple-modality early postoperative follow-up protocol [intraoperative completion angiography, postoperative duplex ultrasonography (DUS), and plain abdominal radiography). Findings were compared for sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) against the first postoperative CTA results for the detection of endoleaks or other signs of EVAR failure.There were 10 inconclusive DUS examinations. In the remaining 90 patients, DUS had 75.0% sensitivity, 95.4% specificity, 85.7% PPV, and 91.5% NPV for the detection of endoleaks. The intraoperative angiogram, DUS, and abdominal radiograph combined resulted in 87.5% sensitivity and 95.4% specificity, with a 65.6% PPV and 94.8% NPV for the detection of endoleaks. In 2 patients who required a reintervention for endoleak in the early postoperative period, both endoleaks were correctly detected by the triple-modality early postoperative follow-up protocol.An early follow-up protocol consisting of an intraoperative completion angiogram, DUS, and abdominal radiograph shows a high sensitivity and NPV for the detection of endoleaks and should detect early migration or kinking of the stent-graft. An initial postoperative CTA is not necessary for most patients undergoing EVAR and should be reserved for those individuals in whom the aforementioned modalities are inconclusive or show signs of endoleak or other EVAR failure.Duplex ultrasound scanning is reliable in the detection of endoleak following endovascular aneurysm repair.To investigate the value of duplex ultrasound scanning (DUSS) in the routine follow up of patients following EVAR.Imaging was reviewed for 310 consecutive patients undergoing EVAR at a single centre. Concurrent ultrasound and CT scans were defined as having occurred within 6 months of each other. There were 244 paired concurrent DUSS and CT scans which were used for further analysis. These modalities were compared with respect to sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and level of agreement (by Kappa statistics) using CT as the 'gold standard'.DUSS failed to detect a number of endoleaks which were seen on CT and the sensitivity of this test was therefore poor (67%). However, the specificity of DUSS compared more favourably with a value of 91%. Positive predictive values ranged from 33-100% but negative predictive values were more reliable with values of 91-100% at all time points post operatively. There were no type I leaks, or endoleaks requiring intervention which were missed on DUSS. Overall, there was a 'fair' level of agreement between the two imaging modalities using Kappa statistics.Although DUSS is not as sensitive as CT scanning in the detection of endoleak, no leaks requiring intervention were missed on DUSS in this study. DUSS is much cheaper than CT and avoids high doses of radiation. DUSS therefore remains a valuable method of follow up after EVAR and can reduce the need for repeated CT scans.Duplex ultrasound scanning versus computed tomographic angiography for postoperative evaluation of endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.The purpose of this study was to compare duplex ultrasound scanning and computed tomographic (CT) angiography for postoperative imaging and surveillance after endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA).One hundred consecutive patients with AAA underwent endovascular (Medtronic AneuRx, stent graft) aneurysm repair and were imaged with both CT angiography and duplex ultrasound scanning at regular intervals after the procedure. Each imaging modality was evaluated for technical adequacy and for documentation of aneurysm size, endoleak, and graft patency. In concurrent scan pairs, accuracy of duplex scanning was compared with CT.A total of 268 CT scans and 214 duplex scans were obtained at intervals of 1 to 30 months after endovascular aneurysm repair (mean follow-up interval, 9+/-7 months). All CT scans were technically adequate, and 198 (93%) of 214 duplex scans were technically adequate for the determination of aneurysm size, presence of endoleak, and graft patency. Concurrent (within 7 days of each other) scan pairs were obtained in 166 instances in 76 patients (1-6 per patient). The maximal transverse aneurysm sac diameter measured with both methods correlated closely (r = 0.93; P <.001) without a significant difference on paired analysis. In 92% of scans, measurements were within 5 mm of each other. Diagnosis of endoleak on both examinations correlated closely (P <.001), and compared with CT, duplex scanning had a sensitivity of 81%, a specificity of 95%, a positive predictive value of 94%, and a negative predictive value of 90%. Discordant results occurred in 8% of examinations, and in none of these was the endoleak close to the attachment sites or associated with aneurysm expansion. An endoleak was demonstrated on both tests in all eight patients who had an endoleak judged severe enough to warrant arteriography. Graft patency was documented in each instance, without discrepancy, with both modalities.High-quality duplex ultrasound scanning is comparable to CT angiography for the assessment of aneurysm size, endoleak, and graft patency after endovascular exclusion of AAA.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound versus color duplex ultrasound imaging in the follow-up of patients after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.This study assessed the negative predictive value, sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy of real-time contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging (CEUS) in the detection of endoleaks in patients with abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) who underwent endovascular repair (EVAR) compared with unenhanced ultrasound imaging. Computed tomography angiography (CTA) was the gold standard. The secondary objective was to define the optimal dose of the second-generation contrast agent to routinely use in the CEUS examinations for endoleak detection.The study enrolled 84 patients with unruptured AAA who were treated with EVAR and underwent CTA follow-up. In the same day, CTA (4- x 1-mm collimation, 1.25-mm slice width), unenhanced US imaging and CEUS imaging was performed in all patients. The CEUS studies were performed after an intravenous bolus injection of 1.2 mL and 2.4 mL of a second-generation contrast agent with continuous low-mechanical index (range, 0.01-0.04) real-time tissue harmonic imaging. The unenhanced US and CEUS studies were interpreted separately by two independent experienced readers to detect the presence of endoleaks by viewing recorded videotapes according to a five-point confidence scale. The standard of reference was represented by the consensus reading of CTA performed by two experienced radiologists not involved in the image analysis. Qualitative analysis as well as sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, and diagnostic accuracy in detecting endoleaks of each reading session were compared.CEUS imaging significantly improved the diagnostic performance of unenhanced US studies in the detection of endoleaks in terms of sensitivity (97.5% vs 62.5%), negative predictive value (97.3% vs 65.1%), accuracy (89.3% vs 63.1%), and specificity (81.8% vs 63.6%). The optimal dose of contrast agent to detect and characterize endoleaks was 2.4 mL. No adverse events were recorded during the study.The results showed CEUS imaging is a fast, noninvasive, reliable, and valid alternative to multislice CTA for endoleak detection in endovascular aortic stent graft patients, and is superior to unenhanced US imaging. Contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging should be performed using a recommended contrast medium dose of 2.4 mL.Role of duplex scan in endoleak detection after endoluminal abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.to validate the role of duplex scan in endoleak detection in postoperative surveillance of endoluminal abdominal aneurysm repair (EAAR).between April 1997 and March 1999, 103 patients were eligible for duplex and computed tomography (CT) scan after EAAR. Mean follow-up was 8 months (range 1-24 months). The study protocol comprised concurrent examination with colour-duplex and CT scan at 1, 6, and 12 months after EAAR, for a total of 198 concurrent examinations. All duplex scan examinations were performed by two vascular surgeons with the same machine (ATL HDI 3000). Interobserver agreement in endoleak detection (kappa=1) and in type of endoleak (kappa=0.7) was evaluated in 50 random duplex examinations. Endoleak detection was examined comparatively in duplex and CT scan, the latter being the gold standard. Sensitivity and specificity tests together with negative- and positive-predictive values (NPV and PPV) were calculated.duplex scan was not feasible in one patient. On CT scan the endoleak rate was 4% at one month, 3% at 6 months, and 4% at one year. Overall, CT scan detected 12 endoleaks. With respect to endoleak detection, duplex scan revealed a great ability in ruling out false-negative results (sensitivity 91.7%, NPV 99.4%), but overestimated the presence of endoleak (specificity 98.4%, PPV 78. 6%). Regarding type of endoleak, the ability of duplex scan to identify the source of endoleak was low (sensitivity 66.7%).duplex scan, if validated, appears to be a reliable means for excluding the presence of endoleak after EAAR.Imaging of aortic lesions with color coded duplex sonography and contrast-enhanced ultrasound versus multislice computed tomography (MS-CT) angiography.The purpose of this study was to compare color coded duplex sonography (CCDS), contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) and multislice computed tomography (MS-CT) angiography in pathological aortic lesions.36 patients with a mean age of 71 years (range 51-87 yrs) with known or suspected treated and untreated aortic lesions detected by CTA were included in this prospective study. Standardized MS-CTA using a 16 or 64 row scanner (Somatom Sensation 16 or 64, Siemens Medical Systems, Forchheim, Germany) served as reference standard. The patients were examined with CCDS and CEUS (Logiq 9, General Electrics, Milwaukee, WI) using the low MI technique with intravenous injection of 1.6-2.4 ml SonoVue (Bracco, Italy). Contrast enhanced ultrasound was performed in the arterial, venous and late venous phase.In all patients CEUS resulted in a relevant diagnosis of an aortic pathology. In total, two covered ruptures, nine aortic dissections and five aortic aneurysms were detected. In the routine follow-up of 20 patients following endovascular repair (EVAR) of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA), one type 3 and three type 2 endoleaks after y-stent graft were detected. For presurgical planning, in addition to the perfused true and false lumen after dissection the perfusion of the renal arteries was examined.CEUS with SonoVue allows the evaluation of aortic lesions. It is an additional examination to CTA. It may allow a more rapid and noninvasive diagnosis, especially in critical patients from intensive care units because of its bedside availability. As the examination is dynamic, additional information about blood flow in the true and false lumen and about renal perfusion after dissections can be evaluated. Especially in patients with contraindications to CT contrast agents (e.g. due to renal failure or severe allergy), CEUS provides a good alternative to MS-CT.Defining a role for contrast-enhanced ultrasound in endovascular aneurysm repair surveillance.Endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) surveillance includes duplex ultrasound, abdominal radiography, and computed tomography angiography. Contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) has emerged as an additional modality whose role remains undefined. We evaluated whether a potential role for CEUS was the elucidation of unresolved issues following standard surveillance modalities.All patients undergoing EVAR at a tertiary referral center had surveillance based on plain abdominal radiograph and duplex ultrasound, with single arterial phase computed tomography angiography reserved for abnormalities or nondiagnostic imaging. In this prospective evaluation, from April 2010 to July 2011, discordance between imaging modalities or unresolved surveillance issues prompted CEUS. Cases and imaging were discussed in a multidisciplinary setting and outcomes recorded.During the study period, 539 patients underwent EVAR surveillance, of whom 33 (6%) had CEUS for unresolved issues (median age, 79; range, 66-90; 28 male). Median follow-up after EVAR was 23 months (range, 0-132). In all cases, CEUS was able to resolve the clinical issue, resulting in secondary intervention in 10 patients (30%). The remaining patients were returned to surveillance. Within the cohort of 33 patients, the clinical issues were categorized into three groups. Group 1: Endoleak of uncertain classification (n = 27: 21 type II, four type I, two had endoleak excluded). Group 2: Significant aneurysm expansion (≥ 5 mm) without apparent endoleak (n = 4: one type II, three had endoleak excluded). Group 3: Target vessel patency following fenestrated EVAR (n = 2: patency confirmed in both).CEUS can enhance EVAR surveillance through clarification of endoleak and target vessel patency when standard imaging modalities are not diagnostic.Improving the follow up after EVAR by using ultrasound image fusion of CEUS and MS-CT.To evaluate whether the image fusion with contrast enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) and CT affects the diagnosis of endoleaks in unclear cases.35 patients with follow-up examinations after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) were included in this retrospective study. Mean patient age was 73 years (range 54-83 y). B-scan, colour doppler and CEUS (1.2 ml SonoVue®, Bracco Imaging Germany) were performed in all patients by an experienced examiner using two different high-end ultrasound system (Siemens ACUSON S2000™, Siemens Healthcare, Erlangen, Germany or Logic E9, GE Healthcare, Milwaukee,WI, USA) with a multifrequency curved array transducer. The examiner was initially blinded to the CT results. Additional image fusion with CT-angiography (CTA) was then performed. The ultrasound examinations were later read by two blinded unbiased investigators with more than five years of clinical ultrasound in consensus.All patients were examined using all diagnostic ultrasound tools of the study. The results show that image fusion is easy and convenient to perform. Conventional ultrasound examination with B-scan and colour Doppler examination detected one Type I and one Type II endoleak, contrast enhanced ultrasound detected one Type I and three Type II endoleaks after EVAR whereas CTA depicted one Type I and two Type II endoleaks. Ultrasound image fusion with CT-angiography confirmed one Type I and three Type II endoleaks.In comparison to conventional ultrasound and CTA the use of CEUS improved the visualization and classification of endoleaks. CEUS shows even small blood flow which can be depicted due to the real time imaging of endoleaks. In unclear cases additional ultrasound image fusion with CEUS and CT angiography improves the visualisation of small endoleaks and this may cause a change in the follow-up interval. CEUS is a good alternative to CT in the detection and follow-up of endoleaks, especially in patients with contraindications to CT contrast agents due to allergies or renal failure, enabling reduced additional costs and exposure to radiation.Prospective comparative analysis of colour-Doppler ultrasound, contrast-enhanced ultrasound, computed tomography and magnetic resonance in detecting endoleak after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.To assess the accuracy of colour-Doppler ultrasound (CDUS), contrast-enhanced ultrasonography (CEUS), computed tomography angiography (CTA) and magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) in detecting endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR).Prospective, observational study.From December 2007 to April 2009, 108 consecutive patients who underwent EVAR were evaluated with CDUS, CEUS, CTA and MRA as well as angiography, if further treatment was necessary. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and negative predictive value of ultrasound examinations were compared with CTA and MRA as the reference standards, or with angiography when available.Twenty-four endoleaks (22%, type II: 22 cases, type III: two cases) were documented. Sensitivity and specificity of CDUS, CEUS, CTA, and MRA were 58% and 93%, 96% and 100%, 83% and 100% and 96% and 100% respectively. CEUS allowed better classification of endoleaks in 10, two and one patients compared with CDUS, CTA and MRA, respectively.The accuracy of CEUS in detecting endoleaks after EVAR is markedly better than CDUS and is similar to CTA and MRA. CEUS seems to be a feasible tool in the long-term surveillance after EVAR, and it may better classify endoleaks missed by other imaging techniques.Single-centre prospective comparison between contrast-enhanced ultrasound and computed tomography angiography after EVAR.To evaluate contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) as an effective alternative to CT-angiography (CTA) for endoleak detection and aneurismal sac diameter measurement in the follow-up after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR).From January 2006 to December 2010, 395 patients underwent EVAR follow-up with both CTA and CEUS. The diameter of the aneurismal sac and the presence of endoleaks were evaluated in all the 395 paired examinations.Bland-Altman plots showed a good agreement in aneurismal sac diameter evaluation between the two imaging modalities. The mean diameter was 54.93 mm (standard deviation (SD) ±12.57) with CEUS and 56.01 mm (SD ± 13.23) with CTA. The mean difference in aneurismal sac diameter was -1.08 mm ± 3.3543 (95% confidence interval (CI), -0.75 to -1.41), in favour of CTA. The number of observed agreement in endoleak detection was 359/395 (90.89%). The two modalities detected the same type I and type III endoleaks. McNemar's χ(2) test confirmed that CTA and CEUS are equivalent in endoleak detection.CEUS demonstrated to be as accurate as CTA in endoleak detection and abdominal aortic aneurysm diameter measurements during EVAR follow-up, without carrying the risks of radiation exposure or nephrotoxicity. Even if it cannot be proposed as the sole imaging modality during follow-up, our analysis suggests that it should have a major role.Comparison of color duplex ultrasound and computed tomography scan for surveillance after aortic endografting.Endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms (AAA) requires regular surveillance for early detection of endograft failure. CT scanning is the gold standard surveillance procedure. The purpose of this study was to assess the reliability of color duplex ultrasound (CDU) in comparison to CT scanning for detection of endoleaks and changes in aneurysmal diameter. From November 1996 to September 1999, a total of 41 patients treated by aortic endografting underwent regular surveillance with both CT scanning and CDU. There were 39 men and 2 women with a mean age of 71 years (range, 50-83). Endovascular treatment involved deployment of a straight aorto-aortic stent in 6 cases, bifurcated stent in 33, and aorta-to-unilateral iliac artery stent in 2. Stent deployment failed in one case; the procedure was conversion to open surgery. Primary or secondary endoleaks were detected in 17 patients (42%). Our findings indicated that CDU is less reliable than the CT scan for detection of endoleaks, but that reliability of CDU for surveillance of aneurysmal diameter is fair.A comparison between contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging and multislice computed tomography in detecting and classifying endoleaks in the follow-up after endovascular aneurysm repair.This study compared contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) imaging and multislice computed tomography (MS-CT) angiography in detecting and classifying endoleaks in the follow-up of patients after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).This retrospective study consisted of 171 patients with CEUS imaging and MS-CT angiography follow-up examinations after EVAR. During follow-up, 489 CEUS and 421 MS-CT examinations were assessed. B-scan, color Doppler, and CEUS imaging were performed in all patients. MS-CT was performed with a 16-slice up to 128-slice scanner.From the 132 patients in our cohort, we obtained 200 contemporary imaging examination pairs. MS-CT was used as the preferred examination in determining the presence of an endoleak. The true-positive rate for the detection of endoleaks with CEUS imaging was 42% (84 of 200), the false-positive rate was 4% (8 of 200), the true-negative rate was 52% (105 of 200), and the false-negative rate was 2% (3 of 200). The sensitivity of CEUS imaging was therefore 97%, and the specificity was 93%. The McNemar test value was 0.227, and the κ coefficient was 0.889.CEUS imaging appears to be as good as MS-CT angiography in the detection of endoleaks in the follow-up after EVAR, with the added advantages of no radiation dose and no nephrotoxicity of the contrast agents. A switch of the preferred examination from MS-CT to CEUS imaging should be considered.The incidence and natural history of type I and II endoleak: a 5-year follow-up assessment with color duplex ultrasound scan.The purpose of this study was the demonstration of the value of color duplex ultrasound (CDU) scanning in the detection of type I endoleak (T1EL) and type II endoleak (T2EL), the correlation of Doppler scan waveform pattern to endoleak persistence or seal, and the description of the natural history of endoleak.The study was a retrospective review of 83 patients who underwent periodic CDU scan and computed tomographic (CT) scan surveillance of the endograft and aneurysm sac after insertion of an aortic endograft for abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA). Forty-one patients (49%) with an endoleak at anytime in the follow-up period form the basis of this report.T1EL was detected in all five patients with CDU and CT scans. T2EL was detected in 36 patients with CDU scan as compared with 18 patients with CT scan. With CT scan, endoleak was not detected when CDU scan showed no endoleak. Conversely, all CT scan--detected endoleaks were found with CDU scanning. The T2EL source artery was identified with CT scan in seven patients, whereas the source was identified in all 36 patients with CDU scan. Endoleak source did not correlate with outcome (seal or persistence). However, a to/fro Doppler scan waveform pattern was associated with spontaneous T2EL seal in seven of 12 patients, and a monophasic or biphasic waveform was associated with endoleak persistence in 14 of 17 patients (P =.023, with chi(2) test). Thirteen of 36 T2ELs underwent spontaneous seal by 6.2 +/- 2.8 months. T2ELs without increasing AAA diameter were observed. Eight patients with persistent T2EL present for more than 12 months did not undergo treatment. However, two patients underwent T2EL obliteration with coils because of AAA sac enlargement. T1EL of the distal attachment site was the initial endoleak identified in five patients, but seven patients harboring T2ELs had subsequent T1ELs develop. For the entire 83 patients, the combined T1EL and T2EL prevalence rate was 20% of patients at a 6-month follow-up period, but this rate increased to 50% after 24 months. The incidence rate of newly detected endoleaks and of spontaneous sealing was 24.4% at 12 months and 12.5% in longer-term follow-up period.CDU scan is effective in the identification of the type of endoleak, the delineation of the vessel involved, and the hemodynamic information not available with any other testing method. Endoleaks have a dynamic natural history characterized by a variable onset with changing branch vessel involvement and spectral flow patterns. Periodic long-term endograft surveillance with CDU scanning is necessary for following existing endoleaks and for detecting new ones. Corroboration of these findings in larger multicenter prospective trials will be needed to determine whether CDU scan analysis of endoleaks would be predictive of long-term success in endovascular AAA repair.Ultrasound-determined diameter measurements are more accurate than axial computed tomography after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair.This study evaluated the correlation of ultrasound (US)-derived aortic aneurysm diameter measurements with centerline, three-dimensional (3-D) reconstruction computed tomography (CT) measurements after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR).Concurrent CT and US examinations from 82 patients undergoing post-EVAR surveillance were reviewed. The aortic aneurysm diameter was defined as the major axis on the centerline images of 3-D CT reconstruction. This was compared with US-derived minor and major axis measurements, as well as with the minor axis measurement on the conventional axial CT images. Correlation was evaluated with linear regression analyses. Agreement between different imaging modalities and measurements was assessed with Bland-Altman plots.The correlation coefficients from linear regression analyses were 0.92 between CT centerline major and US minor measurements, 0.94 between CT centerline major and US major measurements, and 0.93 between CT minor and centerline major measurements. Bland-Altman plots showed a mean difference of 0.11 mm between US major and CT centerline measurements compared with 5.38 mm between US minor and CT centerline measurements, and 4.25 mm between axial CT minor and centerline measurements. This suggested that, compared with axial CT and US minor axis measurements, US major axis measurements were in better agreement with CT centerline measurements. Variability between major and minor US and CT centerline diameter measurements was high (standard deviation of difference, 4.27-4.84 mm). However, high variability was also observed between axial CT measurements and centerline CT measurements (standard deviation of difference, 4.36 mm).The major axis aneurysm diameter measurement obtained by US imaging for surveillance after EVAR correlates well and is in better agreement with centerline 3-D CT reconstruction diameters than axial CT.Surveillance imaging modality does not affect detection rate of asymptomatic secondary interventions following EVAR.Literature reports that surveillance imaging following endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR) gives rise to asymptomatic secondary interventions (SI) in 1.4-9% of cases. This retrospective study aimed to evaluate whether the modality of surveillance imaging influences the detection rate of asymptomatic SI.Two EVAR surveillance protocols were compared at the same vascular centre. Protocol I, performed from January 2003 to December 2006, consisted of colour duplex ultrasound scan (CDU) plus CT angiography (CTA) 1 month after procedure and every 6 months thereafter. Protocol II, performed from January 2007 to June 2010, consisted of CDU plus CTA 1 month after operation and CDU plus plain abdominal films (XR) every 6 months thereafter. In the second protocol, CTA was carried out only during follow-up in specific conditions. The term 'asymptomatic SI' was used when the necessity for SI was detected by imaging alone on an elective basis, prior to development of any symptoms.Enrolment included 376 and 341 consecutive patients with a mean follow-up of 1148 days (range 1-3204 days) and 942 days (range1-1512 days) in Protocols I and II, respectively (p < 0.001). Freedom rates from aneurysmal rupture, freedom from SI and detection rate for asymptomatic SI at 3 years were 98.3% and 98.7% (p = 0.456), 82% and 83.5%(p = 0.876) and 8.8% (n = 33/376) and 8.5%(n = 25/341) (p = 0.49) in Protocols I and II, respectively. Estimated comparison of the costs, radiation exposure and contrast used at 3 years in Protocol I versus Protocol II showed that Protocol II allowed for a three-, four- and six fold reduction in overall costs, radiation exposure and contrast used, respectively (p < 0.0001).The detection rate of asymptomatic SI following EVAR is not affected by the type of surveillance imaging. A surveillance schedule based primarily on CDU and XR appears to be justified.The use of color-flow duplex scan for the detection of endoleaks.Computed tomographic (CT) scan represents the criterion standard for surveillance of endoleaks after endoluminal repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms (erAAAs). Given need for surveillance, risks, and expense of CT scan, the accuracy of color-flow duplex (CFD) scan after erAAA was determined.During a 43-month period, patients enrolled in phase II and III of the AneuRx Multicenter Clinical Trial at our institution underwent CFD scan 1 month after erAAA. Patients with CFD scan results that were positive for endoleak underwent CT scanning at 3 months after erAAA, and those with CFD scan results that were negative for endoleak underwent CT scanning at 6 months after erAAA.Seven of 79 patients (9%) who underwent CFD and CT scanning had the diagnosis of endoleak. All endoleaks that were diagnosed with CT scan were detected with CFD scan. One patient had positive results for endoleak with CFD scan at 1 month and then negative results with CT scan at 3 months. Although this may represent resolution of endoleak, this case was counted as a false-positive result. When compared with CT scan, CFD scan had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 99%, positive predictive value of 88%, negative predictive value of 100%, and accuracy of 99%.CFD scan is an accurate test for the detection of endoleak after erAAA. In addition, most endoleaks diagnosed with CFD scan at 1 month continued to be present at 6 months. This important finding increases the emphasis on the use of this noninvasive test and may initiate earlier intervention of endoleak.[Duplex ultrasound detection of type II endoleaks by after endovascular aneurysm repair: interest of contrast enhancement].Type II endoleaks (EFII) are related to retrograde flow via aorta tributaries. They are the most frequent complication after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR). We hypothesized that the use of contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) by an experienced vascular physician could increase the sensitivity of detecting EFII compared with computed tomography angiography (CTA) taken as the gold standard.From November 2010 to February 2013, patients with EVAR were included prospectively. All patients had a color duplex ultrasound (CDU), CEUS and CTA. Sensitivity, specificity and kappa's coefficient were determined to estimate the performance of CDU and CEUS to assess EFII compared with CTA.Sixty CDU and 60 CEUS explorations were compared to 60 CTA explorations. Nineteen type EFII were detected by CTA, 14 by CDU and 15 by CEUS. CDU sensitivity was 74% (κ=0.75), and CEUS sensitivity was 78% (κ=0.8). Both tests exhibited 97% specificity. There was good agreement between CDU results (κ=0.75) and CEUS results (κ=0.8) compared with CTA. There was very good agreement between CDU and CEUS results for detection of EFII (κ=0.93). There was no statistically significant difference between the sensitivity of CDU and CEUS (P=0.32).Our results suggest that contrast enhancement does not increase yield for ultrasound detection of type II endoleaks when performed by an experienced vascular physician.Endoleak after endovascular aneurysm repair: duplex ultrasound imaging is better than computed tomography at determining the need for intervention.Color duplex ultrasound (CDU) imaging is a noninvasive alternative to computed tomography (CT) for the detection of endoleak. This study compared CT and CDU imaging in the detection of endoleaks requiring intervention after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).All EVARs performed at our institution from 1996 to 2007 were retrospectively reviewed. CDU and CT scans < or =3 months were paired and the presence of an endoleak and its type were recorded. Clinical follow-up was reviewed and interventions for endoleak were recorded. Interventions were performed for type I, for type II with sac enlargement, and for type III endoleaks. The first analysis of clinical test outcomes used the findings of CT scan as a gold standard and the second used the findings at time of intervention as a gold standard.During the time period reviewed, 496 patients underwent EVAR, and 236 of these had CDU and CT follow-up studies paired < or =3 months of each other. Mean follow-up was 17 months (range, <1-111 months). We reviewed 944 studies or 472 pairs. Eighteen patients (7.6%) required intervention for 19 endoleaks: six type I, 11 type II, and two type III. Early endoleak (< or =1 month) requiring reintervention was detected in 1 vs late endoleak (mean, 28 months; range, 0.6-88 months) in 18. All type I and III endoleaks were treated with endovascular cuff or limb extension placement. Three type II endoleaks were treated with open ligation, and coil or glue embolization was used in eight. CDU imaging detected endoleaks requiring intervention in 89% of cases, whereas CT detected endoleak in 58% (P < .05). The ability to correctly identify the type of endoleak as confirmed at time of intervention was 74% with CDU imaging vs 42% by CT (P < .05). CDU, for the detection of endoleak requiring intervention, had a sensitivity of 90%, specificity of 81%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 99%, and positive predictive value (PPV) of 16%, while CT had a sensitivity of 58%, specificity of 87%, NPV of 98%, and PPV of 15%.CDU imaging has a high sensitivity in detecting endoleaks requiring intervention, is better at identifying the type of endoleak, and is an excellent test for graft surveillance after endovascular aneurysm repair. Compared with CT scan, CDU imaging in our experience is the preferred test on which to base an intervention for endoleak.Contrast ultrasound imaging: the best method to detect type II endoleak during endovascular aneurysm repair follow-up.Type II endoleak is the most common complication after endovascular aneurysm repair and require close surveillance. Hence, the need to validate new techniques as alternative to helical CT-scan, the reference standard. The aim of this study is to evaluate the efficacy of Cadence Contrast Pulse Sequencing ultrasound technique with second generation contrast agents in detecting endoleaks, and to compare the results with data obtained from CTA.30 patients with endovascular stent grafts, during their regular follow-up consisting in serial CT and ultrasound exams performed at discharge, at one and six months and at one year thereafter, previous informed consent, were enrolled in a prospectic double blind study design in order to compare triphasic helical CT-scan to another adjunctive ultrasound investigation (Cadence CPS technique with Sono Vue). No more than 15 days occurred between the two examinations. In the study were evaluated only data obtained from the comparison of the two concomitant investigations, independently from the follow-up. Variables analysed were changes in the maximum diameter of the aneurysmal sac, presence and type of endoleak, if detected. In the case of disagreement between the two diagnostic tools angiography was performed.One patient dropped out because of violation of the study protocol (a stroke occurred in the time interval between the two investigations). Both exams visualised patency and proper graft placement in all the remaining patients. Aneurysmal diameters with both investigations overlapped (r(s):0.98). In 21 patients no endoleak was detected with a significant aneurysmal sac shrinkage (P<0.001). In seven patients both methods confirmed presence of endoleak. Ultrasonography detected all type of endoleaks, while CT-scan was uncertain in one. Moreover, in one patient CT-angiography showed an increased aneurysmal diameter without other evidence, while a contrast ultrasound investigation disclosed a type II low-flow endoleak, confirmed by angiography.The Cadence Contrast Pulse Sequencing with echo contrast agent is an ultrasound technique that substantially improves the ultrasound diagnostic reliability.Evaluating outcomes of endoleak discrepancies between computed tomography scan and ultrasound imaging after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair.Endovascular repair for abdominal aortic aneurysm (EVAR) requires regular surveillance to ensure long-term durability. To understand the clinical consequence of discrepancies in endoleak detection between computed tomographic angiography (CTA) and duplex ultrasound (DUS) imaging, this study evaluated patients who underwent EVAR. The aim of the present study was to determine whether these discrepancies affected the long-term outcome after EVAR, and whether DUS predicted the need for re-intervention on the basis of other markers despite missing endoleaks.A review of the prospectively maintained database was completed to capture all EVAR procedures performed between October 1999 and June 2009. Patients were routinely evaluated with computed tomography (CT) and DUS imaging within 30 days after the procedure and intermittently at 6-12 month intervals after treatment. DUS imaging was evaluated with attention toward maximum aneurysm diameter, presence of an endoleak, and compared with findings on simultaneous contrast CT imaging.The database and patient records identified 1,062 EVARs in 992 patients who underwent 3,120 imaging encounters through the surveillance protocol. Of these 3,120 encounters, 610 had both CT scan and ultrasound at the same visit. Contrast material was not used in 49 CT scans, leaving 561 encounters for comparing contrast CT imaging with DUS results. CT and DUS detection of endoleaks correlated in 442 encounters (78.8%). Discrepancies occurred in 119 encounters (21.2%) as follows: CT scan only endoleak in 17.8% (N = 100; type I = 6, type II = 91, and type III = 3) and DUS only endoleak in 3.4% (N = 19; type II = 19) encounters. Of these 119 encounters, 99 (17.6%) did not require secondary interventions. Eventually, 15 patients required intervention after 20 discrepancy encounters (3.6%): 11 patients continued with the surveillance protocol through CT or DUS imaging, whereas four were observed by CT imaging only. Considering these 11 patients, DUS eventually detected an endoleak on subsequent visits in five patients, DUS identified an increase in aneurysm diameter in four patients, and DUS never identified the type II endoleaks in two patients. When the endoleak raised concern or the aneurysm enlarged, we undertook 19 secondary interventions in these 15 patients: vessel embolization (N = 8), iliac extenders (N = 5), graft relining (N = 3), graft explants (N = 2), and proximal cuff (N = 1). Although three ruptures occurred in our entire treatment experience, no ruptures occurred in patients who maintained the prescribed surveillance protocol.Surveillance after EVAR is necessary because secondary interventions are sometimes required. Although DUS has lower sensitivity in detecting endoleaks, comparison with CT findings can identify the appropriate patients for DUS surveillance only. Even considering the discrepancies between CT imaging and DUS, repeated DUS surveillance might identify an unstable aneurysm that requires further intervention. Although DUS has not been established as an exclusive surveillance tool, it can be used to effectively monitor patients after EVAR with reduced need for CT imaging.Contrast harmonic imaging ultrasound and perfusion imaging for surveillance after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair regarding detection and characterization of suspected endoleaks.Is Contrast Harmonic Imaging (CHI) comparable to computed tomography angiography (CTA) scan in detecting and characterizing suspected endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair in a non-selected group including reintervention procedure and branched endografts in daily practice?In a prospective study computed tomography angiography (CTA) and contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) were performed in 30 consecutive patients (26 males, 4 females, mean age: 72 years, range: 38-87) with suspected endoleaks in follow-up (mean 13 months, range: 1-95) after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair or procedure in dissection or penetrated ulcer of the aorta (25 infrarenal, 5 suprarenal stent grafts, mean aortic diameter 56 mm, range: 27-98). CTA was supposed to be gold standard for determining the presence of endoleaks (multislice CT, collimation 16 x 0.75 mm, 100 ml of iodized contrast agent bolus). Ultrasonography used a multi-frequency probe (1-4 MHz) with the modalities of colour coded Doppler sonography (CCDS), power Doppler (PD) combined with contrast enhancement and the technique of contrast harmonic imaging (CHI) and low mechanical index (MI < 0.2). 2.4 ml of SonoVue (Bracco, Altana Pharma GmbH, Italy) were administered to each patient intravenously as a bolus injection.Out of 30 patients, 21 endoleaks were identified in CTA (6 type I or III, 15 type II), 22 in CHI. Thus, sensitivity for CHI was therefore 99%, its specificity 85% (Spearman correlation coefficient (CC) 0.92). In follow-up the localizations of endoleak type I or III exclusively detected by CHI were confirmed as true positive by angiography. Due to its dynamic characteristic CHI seemed to be more helpful in characterization of endoleaks than CTA. In case of a rupture after reintervention a type III endoleak leads to prompt intervention before receiving the result of the CT scan. Altogether, CHI failed to identify 1 combined type I and II endoleak (sensitivity 0.99). Both, CCDS and PD were positive only in 6/30 patients (CC 0.33 and 0.39). Interestingly the application of contrast agent doubles the detection rate of endoleaks (12/30) in CCDS and PD (CC 0.39).Contrast harmonic imaging (CHI) compared to computed tomography angiography (CTA) accurately depicts endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair and stent-graft procedure in dissected and ulcerated aorta. It seems to be superior in characterization of the type of endoleaks and can be established in order to reduce iodized contrast agent and radiation exposure in follow-up. In contrast to CTA scan CHI can be offered to patients with chronic renal insufficiency and allows a dynamic examination and a perfusion analysis.3D contrast enhanced ultrasound for detecting endoleak following endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).CT angiography (CTA) for endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) surveillance involves irradiation and nephrotoxic X-ray contrast agents. Three-dimensional contrast enhanced ultrasound (3D CEUS) is a novel imaging technique that may be more sensitive to blood flow detection than CTA or 2D CEUS. 3D CEUS utilises positional information from magnetic field emitters to assemble all ultrasound reflections into a high-definition image. We compared 3D CEUS with CTA for the detection of endoleak and aneurysm expansion following EVAR.3D CEUS (Curefab), 2D CEUS (Philips IU22), and CTA were compared in 30-paired images from 23 patients. Sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive value were calculated for 2D and 3D CEUS against CTA as the 'gold standard'. Pearson correlation was used to compare aneurysm sac diameter. Data were analysed using SPSS version 19.0.30 paired 3D CEUS and CTA images were analysed from 23 patients. Endoleaks were detected in 17 images with CTA, 18 on 2D CEUS, and 18 on 3D CEUS. The sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of 3D CEUS to detect endoleak were 100%, 92%, 94%, and 100%, respectively. There was excellent correlation (r=0.935; p≤.0001) between CTA and 3D CEUS for AAA sac diameter. Only 3D CEUS detected the inflow and outflow arteries in all 18 scans with endoleak. 2D CEUS detected the inflow in 16 (88.8%) and CTA on 12 (66.6%) of the images.3D CEUS may be more sensitive to endoleak following EVAR than either 2D CEUS or CTA.Time-resolved CT angiography for the detection and classification of endoleaks.To assess the feasibility and diagnostic performance of time-resolved computed tomographic (CT) angiography in the detection and classification of endoleaks after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR) in high-risk patients.The study was approved by our ethics committee. Written informed consent was obtained from all participating patients. Fifty-four patients (42 male and 12 female patients; mean age, 70.9 years ± 9.3 [standard deviation]) with either thoracic (n = 8) or abdominal (n = 46) aortic aneurysms treated with a stent-graft were prospectively included. The patients were examined with a time-resolved CT angiographic protocol consisting of 12 low-dose phases (80 kVp; 120 mAs [effective]; scan range, 27 cm), with 60 mL of iomeprol. Patients with abdominal aneurysm repair also underwent contrast material-enhanced (CE) ultrasonography (US). The time delay between contrast enhancement within the stent lumen and the endoleak was measured. Effective radiation dose was calculated from the scanner protocols. Measures of diagnostic performance for the detection of endoleaks were calculated for time-resolved CT angiography, with CE US serving as the reference standard.All time-resolved CT angiographic data sets were diagnostic. Mean effective radiation dose was 14.6 mSv. Four thoracic and 19 abdominal endoleaks were identified by using time-resolved CT angiography. Seventeen of 19 abdominal endoleaks were confirmed with CE US. This rate resulted in a sensitivity of 94%, a specificity of 93%, a positive predictive value of 89%, and a negative predictive value of 96% for time-resolved CT angiography after abdominal EVAR. Type I endoleaks showed significantly earlier mean peak contrast enhancement (0.28 second ± 0.83) compared with that for type II endoleaks (9.17 seconds ± 3.59, P < .0001).Time-resolved CT angiography with 12 low-dose phases is feasible for patients after thoracic and abdominal EVAR. The protocol approximates the radiation dose of standard triphasic protocols. Its dynamic information differentiates types of endoleaks and shows high diagnostic performance.Duplex ultrasound scanning (DUS) versus computed tomography angiography (CTA) in the follow-up after EVAR.Computed tomography angiography (CTA) is the gold standard follow-up modality after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR). A potential alternative noninvasive and less expensive modality is duplex ultrasound scanning (DUS).We studied 314 follow-up paired scans (DUS and CTA) in 59 patients with EVAR.Endoleak--Endoleak was detected in 23.7% patients. The sensitivity and specificity rates of DUS were 54% and 95.3%, respectively. All 9 endoleaks that needed secondary intervention were detected on DUS. Eight of those were identified within a year after EVAR. Sac size--The mean difference in maximum diameter between the DUS and CTA was < or =5 mm in 84.5% of cases and < or =10 mm in 97.1%. Graft patency--There was 100% agreement between CTA and DUS.Duplex ultrasound scanning was reliable as it detected all the leaks that needed reintervention after EVAR. Duplex ultrasound scanning showed similar results to CTA in detecting sac size and patency.Use of colour duplex ultrasound as a first line surveillance tool following EVAR is associated with a reduction in cost without compromising accuracy.CT scanning remains the postoperative surveillance imaging modality of choice following EVAR. Concerns regarding cost, exposure to ionising radiation and intravenous contrast have led to a search for a less expensive, equally efficacious and safer method of monitoring EVAR patients after endograft deployment. This study evaluated the cost saving obtained if CDUS was employed as a first line surveillance tool following EVAR, as well as comparing the two entities in terms of efficacy.Postoperative surveillance CTs and CDUS scans in the 145 patients who have undergone EVAR from 1st June 2003 to 1st July 2010 were compared for the detection of endoleak and determination of residual sac size.Adopting a protocol where CDUS was employed as the first line surveillance tool following EVAR would result in a reduction in the number of postoperative CTs required in 2010 from 235 to 36. Based on 2010 costings, this would equate to an estimated reduction in expenditure from €117,500 to €34,915 a saving of €82,585. CDUS had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 85% in the detection of endoleaks compared to CT. The positive predictive value was 28% and negative predictive value 100%. The Pearson Coefficient correlation of 0.96 indicates a large degree of correlation between CDUS and CT when measuring residual aneurysm size following EVAR.CDUS can replace CT as the first line surveillance tool following EVAR. This is associated with a significant reduction in the cost of surveillance without any loss of imaging accuracy.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound versus computed tomographic angiography for surveillance of endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.To compare diagnostic accuracy between contrast-enhanced ultrasound (US) and computed tomographic (CT) angiography to detect changes in abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) size and endoleaks during follow-up after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).Between May 2006 and December 2008, 83 patients were consecutively enrolled for contrast-enhanced US and CT angiography imaging during surveillance after EVAR, yielding 127 paired examinations. Comparative analysis was performed for the anteroposterior and transverse maximal diameters of the aneurysm sac and for the presence or absence of endoleak, as determined by US and CT angiography.Contrast-enhanced US demonstrated significantly more endoleaks, predominantly of type II, compared with CT angiography (53% vs 22% of cases). The number of observed agreements was 77 of 127 (61%), indicating a low level of agreement (kappa value of 0.237). US was as accurate as CT angiography in the assessment of maximal aneurysm sac diameters, as shown by Bland-Altman analyses and low coefficients of variation (8.0% and 8.6%, respectively). The interobserver variability for AAA size measurement by US was low, given the interclass correlation coefficients of 0.99 and 0.98 for anteroposterior and transverse maximal diameters, respectively.Contrast-enhanced US may be an alternative to CT angiography in the follow-up of patients after EVAR. As US reduces exposure to the biologic hazards associated with lifelong annual CT angiography, including cumulative radiation dose and nephrotoxic contrast agent load, contrast-enhanced US might be considered as a substitute for CT angiography in the surveillance of patients after EVAR.Efficacy of ultrasound scan contrast agents in the noninvasive follow-up of aortic stent grafts.Computed tomographic angiography (CTA) is currently the most commonly used technique for postoperative surveillance to detect endoleaks after endovascular stent graft repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms. We have evaluated the efficacy of duplex ultrasound scan with the addition of an ultrasound scan contrast agent in documenting endoleaks and compared these results with CTA.Conventional duplex ultrasound scan with color Doppler imaging (CDI) was first done as part of routine postoperative surveillance. After the CDI study, a 1-mL bolus of ultrasound scan contrast was given via an antecubital vein, followed by a 5-mL flush with normal saline solution. The duplex ultrasound scan evaluation of the stent graft was repeated once the contrast agent was circulating throughout the blood pool, with tissue harmonic imaging to optimize visualization of the contrast agent. Status of the stent graft, the presence or absence of any endoleak, and whether these endoleaks were graft related (group I) or arterial branch related (group II) were recorded. Findings were compared with CTA studies done within a 2-week period of the ultrasound scan examination.Twenty patients were evaluated, 18 with modular stent grafts and two with unibody bifurcated stent grafts. Patients had a mean age of 74.5 +/- 7.6 years; 19 were male, with only one female. All stent grafts remained widely patent with normal aortoiliac flow hemodynamics. Duplex ultrasound scan with contrast identified all eight of the endoleaks seen with CTA and was able to determine whether they were group I or group II leaks. In two patients, ultrasound scan with contrast detected small endoleaks at the proximal graft attachment site, with extravasation of contrast into the aneurysm sac during systole. These endoleaks were not seen with CTA but were confirmed with conventional angiography at the time of endovascular closure. Standard duplex ultrasound scan with CDI failed to identify four of the 10 endoleaks in patients with technically difficult conditions.Duplex ultrasound scan, when used with an intravenously administered ultrasound scan contrast agent in the noninvasive follow-up of patients with aortic stent grafts, appears to provide good sensitivity to the presence and type of endoleaks, even in patients with technically difficult conditions not amenable to conventional duplex ultrasound scan with CDI.Ultrasound surveillance of endovascular aneurysm repair: a safe modality versus computed tomography.Routine ultrasound surveillance is adequate and safe for monitoring endovascular aneurysm repairs (EVARs). A retrospective chart review including 160 endograft patients was performed from August 2000 to September 2005. All ultrasound examinations (n = 359) were performed by a board-certified vascular surgery group's accredited laboratory. Registered vascular technologists utilized the same equipment consisting of Siemens Antares high-definition ultrasonography with tissue harmonics and color flow Doppler. An identical protocol was followed by each technologist: scan body and both limbs of the endograft and distal iliac vessels, measure anterior-posterior aneurysm sac size, and detect intrasac pulsatility and color flow. Statistical analysis utilized Pearson's correlation coefficient and the paired t-test. Forty-one endoleaks were discovered out of the 359 exams (11.4%). There were type I (7, 17%), type II (26, 63%), and combined type I with type II (8, 20%) endoleaks. Correlation with computed tomography (CT) was obtained in 35 of these cases. CT discovered three endoleaks that were not seen with ultrasound. However, these particular ultrasound exams were inadequate due to additional factors (bowel gas, body habitus, hernia), which prompted CT investigation and, hence, endoleak discovery. Of the 41 endoleaks found on ultrasound, only 14 were seen on CT. Specifically, 26 type II endoleaks were seen with ultrasound versus only nine during CT. Additional factors addressed included comparison between ultrasound and CT of residual aneurysm sac measurements and conditions limiting ultrasound examination. Although criticized in the past, color flow ultrasonography is a safe and effective modality for surveillance of aortic endografts. Utilizing ultrasound to analyze abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) sac dimensions and endoleak detection is statistically sound for screening AAA status post-EVAR.Could four-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasound replace computed tomography angiography during follow up of fenestrated endografts? Results of a preliminary experience.To evaluate four-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasound (4D-CEUS) as an alternative imaging method to computed tomography angiography (CTA) during follow up of fenestrated endovascular aneurysm repair (FEVAR) for juxta- and para-renal abdominal aortic aneurysms (AAA).Between October 2011 and March 2012, all consecutive patients who underwent FEVAR follow up were included in the study and evaluated with both 4D-CEUS and CTA. The interval between the two examinations was always ≤ 30 days. Endpoints were the comparison of postoperative AAA diameter, AAA volume, presence of endoleaks, revascularized visceral vessel (RVV) visualization, and patency. Comparative analysis was performed using Bland-Altman plots and McNemar's Chi-square test.Twenty-two patients (96% male, 4% female; mean age 74 ± 7 years; American Society of Anesthesiologists grade III/IV 82%/18%) were enrolled. Seventy-eight RVV (fenestrations: 60; scallops: 17; branches: 1) were analyzed. The mean AAA diameter evaluated by 4D-CEUS and CTA was 45 ± 10 mm (range 30-69 mm) and 48 ± 9 mm (range 32-70 mm), respectively. The mean difference was 3 ± 3 mm. The mean AAA volume evaluated by 4D-CEUS and CTA was 150 ± 7 cc (range 88-300 cc) and 159 ± 68 cc (range 80-310 cc), respectively. The mean difference was 7 ± 4 cc; a Bland-Altman plot revealed agreement in AAA diameter and volume evaluation (p < .01) between 4D-CEUS and CTA. The observed agreement for the detection of endoleaks was 95%. McNemar's Chi-square test confirmed that 4D-CEUS and CTA were equivalent (p > .05) at detecting endoleaks. The first segment of six (8%) RVVs (four renal and two superior mesenteric arteries) was not directly visualized by 4D-CEUS owing to obesity, but the contrast enhancement into the distal part of vessel or into the relative parenchyma gave indirect information about their patency. McNemar's Chi-square test demonstrated the superiority of CTA (p = .031) in visualizing RVVs. The patency of 77/78 RVVs was confirmed with both techniques. McNemar's Chi-square test confirmed that 4D-CEUS and CTA were equivalent in their ability to detect visceral vessel patency.The data suggest that 4D-CEUS is as accurate as CTA in the evaluation of postoperative AAA diameter and volume, endoleak detection, and RVV patency after FEVAR. Four-dimensional CEUS could provide hemodynamic information regarding RVVs, and reduce radiation exposure and renal impairment during follow up. Obesity limits the diagnostic accuracy of 4D-CEUS.Color duplex ultrasound and contrast-enhanced ultrasound in comparison to MS-CT in the detection of endoleak following endovascular aneurysm repair.The purpose of this study was to compare Color Duplex Ultrasound (CDU), Contrast-Enhanced Ultrasound (CEUS) and Multislice Computed Tomography (MS-CT) angiography in the routine follow up of patients following Endovascular Repair (EVAR) of Abdominal Aortic Aneurysm (AAA).43 consecutive patients with AAA underwent endovascular aneurysm repair and were imaged with CDU, CEUS and MS-CT angiography at regular intervals after the procedure. Each imaging modality was evaluated for the detection of endoleaks. The presence of endoleaks was analyzed and the conspicuity of findings was assessed.CTA was used as gold standard in determining the presence of endoleaks. CDU was true positive for endoleaks in 5/43 patients (11.6%) and false positive for endoleaks in 2/43 patients (4.6%). The sensitivity of CDU was therefore 33.3% and its specificity 92.8%; the positive and negative predictive values were 0.71 and 0.72, respectively. CEUS was true positive for the detection of endoleaks in 15/43 patients (34.9%) and false positive in 2/43 patients (4.6%). The sensitivity of CEUS was therefore 100% and its specificity 93%; the positive and negative predictive values were 0.88 and 1. In the follow up the two false positive endoleaks in CEUS were confirmed as true positive endoleaks by CEUS and MS-CT. In our small patient group, contrast-enhanced ultrasound seemed to be more accurately in demonstrating endoleaks after EVAR than MS-CT angiography and may be considered as a primary surveillance modality whereas duplex ultrasound scanning alone is not as sensitive as CEUS and MS-CT angiography in detection of endoleaks. Especially in patients with contraindications for CT contrast agents (e.g. due to renal failure or severe allergy) CEUS provides a good alternative to MS-CT.Postoperative color flow duplex scanning in aortic endografting.To report the feasibility and sensitivity of duplex sonography compared to computed tomography (CT) for aortic endograft follow-up surveillance.In a 26-month period, 113 aortic aneurysm patients received 79 tube and 34 bifurcated stent-grafts. Follow-up used contrast-enhanced CT scanning and duplex sonography with an intravenous ultrasound contrast agent (Levovist).Eleven patients (9.7%) were converted to open repair; 1 died from hemorrhagic shock secondary to retroperitoneal hematoma. The mean follow-up time was 7.2 months (range 1 to 24), during which 5 patients died of unrelated causes. Sixteen primary (within 30 days) and 5 secondary endoleaks were detected by duplex after tube graft implantation. Among 5 endoleaks due to retrograde side-branch perfusion, 3 were detected only with contrast-enhanced duplex scanning. Iliac artery occlusion was also documented using duplex; however, 2 stent fractures could not be seen with ultrasound. Ten primary endoleaks were detected in bifurcated stent-graft patients. One endoleak originating from the distal iliac limb anchoring site was missed by duplex owing to bowel gas. Graft limb thrombosis was clearly identified by lack of a flow signal on duplex.Duplex sonography could be a valuable, reliable, and economical surveillance tool for endovascular aortic reconstructions. The adjunctive use of an intravenous ultrasound contrast agent increased the sensitivity for detecting endoleak to a level comparable to contrast-enhanced CT scanning. However, stent fractures may not be seen on ultrasound, and bowel gas can interfere with obtaining an adequate image.Classification of endoleaks in the follow-up after EVAR using the time-to-peak of the contrast agent in CEUS examinations.To evaluate the feasibility of the classification of endoleaks following endovascular aortic aneurysm repair using the time-to-peak of the contrast agent in CEUS examinations.In this retrospective study, a cohort of 171 patients with a total of 489 CEUS follow-up examinations after EVAR were included. In 254 of the 489 examinations, an endoleak was seen and the time-to-peak was measured in seconds. Existence of an endoleak was confirmed by CT as the gold standard.We evaluated 254 CEUS video sequences showing an endoleak out of a total of 489 examinations. Kruskal-Wallis test revealed with p = 0.001 differences between the single endoleak types based on the time to peak. Correction after Bonferroni showed significant differences between type Ia compared to Ib and to IIa over inferior mesenteric artery (IMA) and IIa over lumbar artery (LA). There are also disparities between type Ib and type IIa IMA and type III, furthermore between type IIa IMA compared to IIa LA and type III as well as type IIa LA matched to type III.CEUS is an important method for the follow-up after EVAR. The time-to-peak does not seem to be a useful additional feature in classifying endoleaks, although there are differences between the time-to-peak of the single endoleak types and it is possible to make an order of the different endoleak types referring to the mean values.Application of duplex US for characterization of endoleaks in abdominal aortic stent-grafts: report of five cases.Endoleaks were detected with helical computed tomographic (CT) angiography in five patients after placement of an aortobiliac stent-graft. The leaks were subsequently evaluated with duplex ultrasonography (US) and, in four patients, with conventional aortography as well. CT angiography revealed a total of seven endoleaks, all of which were prospectively classified as reconstitution (type II) leaks. Duplex US demonstrated six of the seven endoleaks. At duplex US, two of the leaks were characterized as attachment-site (type I) leaks; these two diagnoses were confirmed during subsequent angiography and profoundly altered clinical care. As an adjunct to CT angiography in evaluating endoleaks, duplex US provides hemodynamic information that enables further characterization of the type of endoleak and facilitates appropriate clinical care.Endoleak after aortic stent graft repair: diagnosis by color duplex ultrasound scan versus computed tomography scan.The purpose of this study was to compare the accuracy of a color duplex ultrasound scan (CDU) to a computerized axial tomography scan (CT) in the diagnosis of endoleaks after stent graft repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms.The Endovascular Aneurysm Clinical Trial Core Laboratory records were reviewed from 117 concurrent CDU and CT studies that were performed in 79 patients who were implanted with the Endovascular Technologies stent graft device between December 1995 and January 1997. All of the studies were interpreted by the Core Laboratory as having the presence or the absence of an endoleak or as being indeterminate because of technical factors. Of the 117 videotaped CDU studies available for reexamination, 100 were reassessed for technical adequacy on the basis of the following criteria: a satisfactory imaging of the aneurysm sac and of the stent graft with gray scale, and both color and spectral Doppler scan evaluation for endoleak outside the endograft and within the aneurysm sac.Of the 117 studies, 103 CDUs (88%) and 114 CTs (97%) were recorded as having the presence or the absence of an endoleak and 14 CDUs (12%) and 3 CTs (3%) were indeterminate. For the studies that were recorded to have the presence or the absence of an endoleak, the sensitivity, the specificity, the positive and the negative predictive values, and the accuracy of CDUs as compared with CTs were 97%, 74%, 66%, 98%, and 82%, respectively. Of the 100 CDU videotaped studies available for review, the following results were seen: (1) 93 CDUs had satisfactory B-mode images, (2) 76 had satisfactory color Doppler scan images to evaluate for endoleaks, (3) 55 had color Doppler scan assessment of the entire abdominal aortic aneurysm sac for endoleak, and (4) 27 had spectral Doppler scan waveform confirmation of suspected endoleaks. Only 19 CDU studies (19%) with all 4 criteria for complete assessment of endoleak were performed.Although most of the CDU studies were technically suboptimal, the CDUs reliably identified endoleaks with an excellent sensitivity and a negative predictive value as compared with CT scans.Detection of endoleak with enhanced ultrasound imaging: comparison with biphasic computed tomography.To compare unenhanced and enhanced ultrasound imaging to biphasic computed tomography (CT) in the detection of endoleak after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) repair.Fifty-three patients (44 men; mean age 70 years) were examined during 96 follow-up visits after endovascular AAA repair. All patients had color Doppler and power Doppler ultrasound studies performed before and after the administration of an ultrasound contrast agent. Biphasic (arterial and delayed) CT was performed on the same day, and the ultrasound and CT studies were independently scored to record the presence or absence of endoleak and the level of confidence in the observation.The sensitivity of the ultrasound techniques to detect endoleak improved with the use of ultrasound contrast media, ranging from a low of 12% with unenhanced color Doppler to 50% with enhanced power Doppler. However, the enhanced power Doppler failed to detect 9 type II endoleaks identified by CT (86% negative predictive value for endoleak). There were only 2 graft-related endoleaks in the study; one was diagnosed from the ultrasound image, but the other had nondiagnostic ultrasound scans because of poor views.Ultrasound scanning with or without contrast enhancement was not as reliable as CT in diagnosing type II endoleak. CT imaging remains our surveillance modality of choice.Review of postoperative CT and ultrasound for endovascular aneurysm repair using Talent stent graft: can we simplify the surveillance protocol and reduce the number of CT scans?Simplifying a postoperative surveillance protocol for endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) requires quality control comparing computerized tomography (CT) and ultrasound (US) results of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) diameter measurements and endoleaks.To test if US is comparable to CT, then assess a simplified follow-up with our conventional surveillance to assess patient safety.During 2001-2006, data on 56 patients treated with Talent stent graft were prospectively registered. Median follow-up was 41.5 months (range, 2-94 months), with CT, US, and plain film abdomen X-rays (PFA) at 1, 6, and 12 months, then yearly. Bland-Altman plot was used to assess the agreement between CT and US measuring the AAA diameters and mixed model by the time effect to assess the difference in diameter over time. Sensitivity and specificity for detection of endoleaks by US, with CT as 'gold standard' were calculated. A simplified surveillance protocol with US/PFA at 6 and 8 weeks, CT/US/PFA at 1 year, and yearly US/PFA thereafter, was evaluated. CT was carried out when poor visibility, endoleak detected, AAA diameter increase (≥5 mm) on US or migration (≥10 mm) on PFA. This regime was compared with our conventional follow-up protocol.Diameter measurements on US appear comparable to CT with 91% specificity and 85% sensitivity for endoleaks detected by US. Using the simplified surveillance protocol no endoleaks, migrations, or endotension requiring treatment were overlooked. The simplified protocol generated 53 selective CT scans, avoiding approximately 144 CT scans. If further simplified by omitting the 1-year CT scan, one type II endoleak would be missed with a 1-year delay, eliminating a further 45 CT scans.US appears comparable to CT in the follow-up of Talent stent grafts in our institution. The proposed simplified surveillance protocol seems safe and can lead to a significant reduction in the number of CT scans.Computed tomography and ultrasound in follow-up of patients after endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysm.The purpose of this study was to compare our experience with duplex ultrasonography (US) and computed tomography (CT) for the routine follow-up of patients after endovascular repair (EVAR) of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA). We reviewed the electronic charts and radiologic exams of the first 125 patients (113 males, 12 females, median age of 76 years, range 48-98 years) with AAA treated by EVAR from June 1996 to November 2001. Our follow-up protocol included serial CT and US at regular intervals after the procedure (before discharge, at 1 month, and then every 6 months). Adequacy of each exam, ability to detect endoleaks, measurements of AAA diameter, and ability to determine graft patency were compared. For endoleak detection, comparison between CT and US was done using CT as the gold standard. A total of 608 exams, 337 CTs and 271 US, were performed 1 day to 5 years after endovascular aneurysm repair; 98% of CT and 74% of US were technically adequate. Contrary to CT, the proportion of adequate US exam was significantly less in patients with higher body mass index (BMI > or = 30 = 54% vs. BMI < 30 = 81%, p < 0.001) and for pre-discharge US compared to the post-discharge US (54% vs. 88%, p = 0.0005). Concurrent scan pairs were obtained in 252 instances in 107 patients (1-8 pairs per patient). Excellent correlation between AAA diameter measured on CT and US was noted (correlation coefficient of 0.9, p < 0.0001). However, agreement was poor. CT anteroposterior (AP) and transverse measurements were on average 2.9 mm (95% limits of agreement = -7 to 13 mm) and 1.8 mm (95% limits of agreement = -9 to 12 mm) greater than US. For AAA diameter change, there was no case of increase AP diameter on CT. However, in 23% (29/128 pairs of sets) of US, an increase in AAA size that could have influenced patient management (> or = 4 mm) was reported despite no change demonstrated on CT. For endoleak detection, sensitivity and specificity of US compared to that of CT was 25% and 89%. Similar sensitivity and specificity were noted when we excluded the first set (25% and 95%), sets done prior to 2000 (30% and 89%), inadequate CT or US scans (31% and 98%), or duplicate sets of results for each patient (28% and 81%). Of the 27 endoleaks missed on US in 17 patients, 2 were type I endoleaks. None of the four endoleaks seen only on US were type I endoleak. US usefulness prior to discharge was reduced by the high rate of inadequate exam, especially in obese patients. Despite the excellent correlation in AAA diameter between US and CT, there was significant disagreement in AAA diameter measurement and diameter change. Sensitivity of nonstandardized US for endoleak was low compared to CT. CT remains our primary imaging study after EVAR, but standardization of post-EVAR US technique may improve its accuracy.Color duplex ultrasonography is insensitive for the detection of endoleak after aortic endografting: a systematic review.To synthesize the available evidence regarding the diagnostic accuracy of color duplex ultrasonography (CDU) versus the accepted gold-standard of contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) for the detection and classification of endoleaks after aortic endografting.A systematic search of the literature was conducted using electronic bibliographical databases and other means to gather articles published between 1991 and 2004. Articles were scrutinized against inclusion/exclusion criteria that broadly followed the QUADAS quality assessment guidelines. The results of diagnostic CDU were expressed for each study as a 2x2 contingency table, and summary statistics (sensitivity/specificity with 95% confidence intervals [CI]) were calculated. Pooled and random effects meta-analyses were performed.Eight published studies and 2 unpublished studies from Charing Cross and St. George's Hospitals (711 patients, 1355 paired scans performed > or = 1 month after endografting) were eligible for inclusion. From meta-analyses, the pooled sensitivity of CDU (versus CT as the gold standard) was 69% (95% CI 52% to 87%) and the specificity of CDU was 91% (95% CI 87% to 95%). These parameters did not appear to vary over time when a smaller dataset of 117 patients with 239 paired scans was used to compare CT and CDU specifically at 3, 12, and 24 months after endografting. Endoleak classification data, which was derived from only 5 small studies, indicated that CDU appeared to have better diagnostic accuracy in detecting type I or type III endoleaks compared with type II endoleaks; however, the data were insufficient for statistical analysis.CDU currently does not have sufficient diagnostic accuracy for the detection of all endoleaks in routine clinical practice. The diagnostic accuracy of CDU may improve if type II endoleaks are ignored.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound vs. CT angiography in fenestrated EVAR surveillance: a single-center comparison.To evaluate contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) as an effective alternative to computed tomographic angiography (CTA) during follow-up after fenestrated endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) of juxtarenal aortic aneurysms.Between January 2008 and April 2011, 62 patients (all men; mean age 72 years) underwent fenestrated EVAR follow-up with both CTA and CEUS. In a retrospective analysis, the first CTA and CEUS postoperative examinations after EVAR were compared for endoleak detection, aneurysm sac diameter, and target vessel patency. The examinations were performed within 30 days of the procedure and the interval between the 2 scans was <7 days. Only fenestrated endografts with up to 3 fenestrations (with or without a scallop) were eligible so that the entire implant could be visualized with standard abdominal ultrasound.The mean diameters of the aneurysm sac were 56.58±8.56 mm with CEUS and 57.70±8.59 mm with CTA. The mean difference in aneurysm sac diameter was -1.13±3.19 mm (95% CI -0.34 to -1.92), with CTA measurements tending to be slightly larger. Bland-Altman plots showed good agreement between the imaging modalities with respect to aneurysm sac diameter (Spearman correlation coefficient r(s)=0.921, p<0.01). Endoleaks were detected by CTA in 7 (11.3%) of 62 patients and by CEUS in 6 (9.7%). In 59 (95.16%) cases, the tests agreed, and their equivalence was confirmed by binomial distribution testing. There was complete agreement between CEUS and CTA in the assessment of target vessels (144/146 patent target arteries; 1 had a significant stenosis and another was thrombosed).CEUS is as accurate as CTA in endoleak detection, abdominal aortic aneurysm diameter measurement, and the evaluation of target vessels during surveillance of fenestrated stent-grafts. Although it cannot yet be proposed as the only imaging modality during follow-up, CEUS could be usefully employed with the self-evident advantage of reducing lifetime exposure to ionizing radiation.Evaluation of abdominal aortic aneurysm after endoluminal treatment: comparison of color Doppler sonography with biphasic helical CT.The purpose of this study is to compare color Doppler sonography with biphasic helical CT in the evaluation of abdominal aortic aneurysms after endovascular repair.Fifty-five patients prospectively underwent both color Doppler sonography and helical CT within 7 days after treatment by endovascular stent-graft. Aneurysmal thrombosis, the patency of the grafts, and the presence of a leak were evaluated in all patients. When a perigraft leak was observed, an attempt was made to identify its origin and outflow vessels. Helical CT was considered the gold standard technique.Helical CT revealed aneurysmal thrombosis in 33 patients and a perigraft leak in 22 patients. In five patients, helical CT detected a small perigraft leak not shown by color Doppler sonography. In three patients with suboptimal examinations, color Doppler sonography revealed a suspected perigraft leak that was not confirmed by helical CT. In these eight patients, the perigraft leak was sealed or no longer observed during follow-up. Compared with enhanced helical CT, the sensitivity and specificity of color Doppler sonography for the diagnosis of a perigraft leak were 77% and 90%, respectively. In seven other patients, helical CT was superior to color Doppler sonography in detecting the origin of the perigraft leak and the outflow vessels. Two iliac artery dissections and one distal migration of the prosthesis were revealed only by helical CT.Although color Doppler sonography may detect substantial perigraft leaks, helical CT is superior for detecting the origin of the perigraft leak, the outflow vessels, and the detection of complications related to the procedure.Comparison of computed tomography and duplex imaging in assessing aortic morphology following endovascular aneurysm repair.Computed tomography (CT) has been used to assess patients following endovascular aneurysm repair to determine the need for secondary endoluminal or operative procedures. This prospective study compared CT and duplex imaging to evaluate aneurysm morphology following endoluminal aortic grafting.Twenty patients were evaluated at regular intervals following successful endoluminal aneurysm repair. CT and duplex scanning were compared in their ability to determine aneurysm and aortic diameter, the presence of perigraft extravasation (endoleaks) and technical defects in the endograft.In 20 patients who were assessed 6 months after operation, duplex imaging identified four endoleaks (two early, two late; one proximal, three distal). In three cases, the aneurysm diameter progressively increased after operation. In patients with a thrombosed aneurysm sac, the aneurysm regressed at a median of 0.40 (range 0.13-0.8) cm per year. The CT findings were similar (median regression 0.43 (range 0-1.0) cm per year), although CT was unable to predict the site of the leak as accurately as duplex imaging. CT demonstrated that the diameter of the juxtarenal aorta increased following endografting.Duplex imaging is a less invasive, less costly alternative to CT in the follow-up of patients after endoluminal aortic surgery. Increase in size of the aneurysm sac following endovascular aneurysm repair strongly suggests the presence of an endoleak.Role of multidetector CT angiography and contrast-enhanced ultrasound in redefining follow-up protocols after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.Contrast-enhanced ultrasonography (CEUS) is an appealing alternative to computed tomography angiography (CTA) for the follow-up of patients who underwent endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR). We sought to evaluate the accuracy of CEUS compared with a particularly tailored protocol of CTA performed with a 64-row multidetector CT.The study prospectively enrolled 88 consecutive patients for CEUS and CTA imaging during follow-up after EVAR, yielding 142 paired examinations. The outcome is represented by three main goals: identification and characterisation of endoleaks, evaluation of graft patency and measurement of aneurysm diameter. Triple-phase CTA was the gold standard.Sensitivity and specificity of CEUS compared with CTA in endoleak and graft patency evaluation were 91.89% and 100% and 72% and 100%, respectively. A very high correlation between CTA and CEUS diameter measurements was established. CEUS did not appear superior to CTA in endoleak detection, probably because a tailored CTA protocol with a delayed phase (180 s) allows detection of low-flow endoleaks.Patient management was not different following CEUS and CTA results. CTA cannot yet be completely replaced, but several limitations (radiation exposure, contrast agent) encourage redefining the routine follow-up imaging modality. We suggest an algorithm of surveillance alternating CTA and CEUS.Abdominal aortic aneurysm: contrast-enhanced US for missed endoleaks after endoluminal repair.To evaluate contrast material-enhanced ultrasonography (US) for depiction of endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (or endovascular aneurysm repair [EVAR]) in patients with aneurysm enlargement and no evidence of endoleak.From November 1998 to February 2003, 112 patients underwent EVAR. At follow-up, duplex US and biphasic multi-detector row computed tomographic (CT) angiography were performed. In 10 patients (group A), evident aneurysm enlargement was observed, with no evidence of complications, at both CT angiography and duplex US. Group A patients, 10 men (mean age, 69.6 years +/- 10 [standard deviation]), underwent US after intravenous bolus injection of a second-generation contrast agent, with continuous low-mechanical index (0.01-0.04) real-time tissue harmonic imaging. Group B patients, 10 men (mean age, 71.3 years +/- 8.2) with aneurysm shrinkage and no evidence of complications, and group C patients, 10 men (mean age, 73.2 years +/- 6) with CT angiographic evidence of endoleak, underwent contrast-enhanced US. Digital subtraction angiography (DSA) was performed in groups A and C. Endoleak detection and characterization were assessed with imaging modalities used in groups A-C; at contrast-enhanced US, time of detection of endoleak, persistence of sac enhancement, and morphology of enhancement were evaluated.In group A, contrast-enhanced US depicted one type I, six type II, one type III, and two undefined endoleaks that were not detected at CT angiography. All leakages were characterized by slow and delayed echo enhancement detected at longer than 150 seconds after contrast agent administration. DSA results confirmed findings in all patients; percutaneous treatment was performed. In group B, contrast-enhanced US did not show echo enhancement; in group C, results with this modality confirmed findings at CT angiography and DSA.Contrast-enhanced US depicts endoleaks after EVAR, particularly when depiction fails with other imaging modalities.Computed tomography versus color duplex ultrasound for surveillance of abdominal aortic stent-grafts.To compare the ability of computed tomography (CT) and color duplex ultrasound (CDUS) to detect endoleak and accurately measure aortic aneurysm diameters after endovascular repair.Between February 2000 and October 2004, 178 consecutive patients (156 men; mean age 74 years, range 49-89) were treated with aortic stent-grafts (86 Ancure, 55 AneuRx, and 37 Excluder). The follow-up protocol included serial CT and CDUS at 1 month and every 6 months thereafter. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and Kappa statistics (kappa) were calculated using CT as the gold standard; Bland-Altman analysis was used to determine the 95% limits of agreement. Paired and unpaired t tests and correlation coefficients were used to compare the methods.Follow-up ranged from 1 to 53 months (mean 16), during which 367 paired CT and CDUS studies were acquired. The mean diameter of the AAA sac after repair was 5.15 cm by CT versus 4.99 cm by CDUS (p=0.07); 93% of paired studies were somewhat similar (<or=5 mm). Mean pre to postoperative AAA size changes throughout follow-up were -0.60 mm for CT versus -0.58 mm for CDUS (p=0.78). Thirty-four (19%) endoleaks were detected (26 early and 8 late). Versus CT, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of CDUS for detecting endoleaks were 68%, 99%, 85%, and 97%, respectively (kappa=0.73). CDUS was more accurate in detecting type I endoleak than type II (88% versus 50%, p=0.046).Although CDUS has good correlation to CT in measuring the size of AAAs, it has a lower sensitivity in detecting endoleak, particularly type II. Therefore, CT scans should remain the primary imaging modality for the diagnosis of endoleak.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging for aortic stent-graft surveillance.To compare unenhanced and enhanced ultrasound imaging to computed tomographic angiography (CTA) or magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) for surveillance of aortic endografts.Thirty consecutive patients (29 men; mean age 69 years, range 50-82) who underwent endovascular aortic aneurysm repair agreed to participate in a follow-up program. Patients underwent CTA (26/30) or MRA (4/30), plain abdominal radiography, and unenhanced and enhanced ultrasound examinations at 3, 12, and 24 months to evaluate aneurysm diameter, endoleaks, and graft patency. The accuracy of ultrasound was compared with CTA or MRA as the reference standards.Twenty-six patients reached the 24-month assessment (mean follow-up 30 months, range 6-60). All endoleaks detected by CTA or MRA were confirmed by enhanced ultrasound; the aneurysm diameter in these patients remained unchanged or increased. In patients without endoleaks on any imaging method, the sac diameter remained unchanged or decreased. Endoleaks disclosed by enhanced ultrasound alone, all type II, numbered 16 at 3 months, 6 at 12 months, and 3 at 24 months. In this group, the aneurysm diameter remained unchanged or increased. Enhanced ultrasound yielded 100% sensitivity in detecting endoleaks, but compared with CTA and MRA, all endoleaks detected by enhanced ultrasound alone were false positives (mean specificity 65%). Nevertheless, because changes in the postoperative aneurysm diameter were similar in patients with endoleaks detectable on CTA/MRA and on enhanced ultrasound ("true positives") and in those with endoleaks detectable only on enhanced ultrasound ("false positives"), some endoleaks were possibly "true positive" results.Enhanced ultrasound is a useful method in the long-term surveillance of endovascular aortic aneurysm repairs, possibly in association with CTA or MRA. Enhanced ultrasound also seems able to identify endoleaks missed by other imaging techniques, but this conclusion awaits further investigation.Use of contrast-enhanced ultrasound in follow-up after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair.To investigate the use of contrast-enhanced ultrasound in the detection of endoleak after endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysm.Eighteen patients underwent follow-up on 20 occasions after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair by arterial-phase contrast-enhanced spiral computed tomography (CT). All patients had unenhanced color Doppler ultrasound and Levovist-enhanced ultrasound on the same day. The ultrasound examinations were reported in a manner that was blind to the CT results. CT was regarded as the gold standard for the purposes of the study.There were three endoleaks shown by CT. Unenhanced ultrasound detected only one endoleak (sensitivity, 33%). Levovist-enhanced ultrasound detected all three endoleaks (sensitivity, 100%). Levovist-enhanced ultrasound indicated an additional six endoleaks that were not confirmed by CT (specificity, 67%; positive predictive value, 33%). In one of these six cases, the aneurysm increased in size, which indicates a likelihood of endoleak. Two of the remaining false-positive results occurred in patients known to have a distal implantation leak at completion angiography.In this small group of patients, contrast-enhanced ultrasound appears to be a reliable screening test for endoleak. The false-positive results with enhanced ultrasound may be due to the failure of CT to detect slow flow collateral pathways. Although the number of patients in this study is small, enhanced ultrasound may be more reliable than CT in detecting endoleak.Duplex ultrasound in aneurysm surveillance following endovascular aneurysm repair: a comparison with computed tomography aortography.Cumulative radiation dose, cost, and increased demand for computed tomography aortography (CTA) suggest that duplex ultrasonography (DU) may be an alternative to CTA-based surveillance. We compared CTA with DU during endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) follow-up.Patients undergoing EVAR had clinical and radiological follow-up data entered in a prospectively maintained database. For the purpose of this study, the gold standard test for endoleak detection was CTA, and an endoleak detected on DU alone was assumed to be a false positive result. DU interpretation was performed independently of CTA and vice versa.One hundred thirty-two patients underwent EVAR, of whom 117 attended for follow-up ranging from six months to nine years (mean, 32 months). Adequate aneurysm sac visualisation on DU was not possible in 1.7% of patients, predominantly due to obesity. Twenty-eight endoleaks were detected in 28 patients during follow-up. Of these, 24 were initially identified on DU (four false negative DU examinations), and eight had at least one negative CTA with a positive DU prior to diagnosis. Twenty-three endoleaks were type II in nature and three of these patients had increased sac size. There was one type I and four type III endoleaks. Two of these (both type III) had an increased sac size. Of 12 patients with increased aneurysm size of 5 mm or more at follow-up, five had an endoleak visible on DU, yet negative CTA and a further five had endoleak visualisation on both DU and CTA. Of six endoleaks which underwent re-intervention, all were initially picked up on DU. One of these endoleaks was never demonstrated on CTA and a further two had at least one negative CTA prior to endoleak confirmation. Positive predictive value for DU was 45% and negative predictive value 94%. Specificity of DU for endoleak detection was 67% when compared with CTA, because of the large number of false positive DU results. Sensitivity for DU was 86%, with all clinically significant endoleaks demonstrated on CTA also detected on DU.Despite its low positive predictive value, we found DU to be a sensitive test for the detection of clinically significant endoleaks. Given concerns about cumulative radiation exposure and cost, and the surprisingly low sensitivity of CTA for endoleak detection in this series, selective CTA based on DU surveillance may be a more appropriate long-term strategy.Color-flow duplex ultrasound scan versus computed tomographic scan in the surveillance of endovascular aneurysm repair.The purpose of this study is to compare both computed tomographic scan (CT) and color flow duplex ultrasound scanning (CDU) as surveillance modalities for clinically significant endoleaks and to evaluate concordance in abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) diameter measurements in patients after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) in a busy hospital vascular laboratory.We conducted a retrospective review of all patients who underwent endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms between February 1996 and November 2002 and had same-day CT and CDU studies. Ninety-seven patients enrolled in phase II clinical studies of Ancure devices had long-term follow-up with both modalities. The other patients underwent simultaneous studies, usually only at the 1-month postoperative visit. Peripheral vascular studies were performed by two certified vascular technicians; all CT scans were reviewed by one vascular surgeon. CT was used as the standard against which the sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, and positive predictive value of CDU in endoleak detection was determined. Statistics were performed by using the paired t test; a P value <.05 was considered significant. Kappa statistic was used to assess the correlation between CDU and CT in identifying endoleaks. The correlation between CT and CDU in AAA size measurements as well as in serial size measurements was also determined.Four hundred ninety-five same-day CT and CDU examinations were reviewed in 281 patients. Patients had an average follow-up of 34.6 months (range, 1 to 72 months). Thirty-five leaks were identified among the patients studied (12.4% overall). In comparison with CT, diagnosis of endoleak with ultrasound scanning was associated with a sensitivity of 42.9%, specificity of 96.0%, positive predictive value of 53.9%, and negative predictive value of 93.9%. The correlation between the two modalities was modest (kappa statistic 0.427). The minor axis transverse diameter as measured by ultrasound and CT scans (4.81 +/- 1.1 cm on CT and 4.55 +/- 1.1 cm on ultrasound) correlated closely (r =.93, P <.001.) Seventy percent of paired studies differed by < or =5 mm. Changes in aneurysm size throughout follow-up were -.29 +/-.71 cm on CT scan -.34 +/-.57 cm on duplex ultrasound scan. The correlation coefficient was.65 (P <.001). There was no significant difference in the change as measured by either modality on the paired t test.Although CDU demonstrates a high degree of correlation with CT scan in determining aneurysm size change over time, it has a low sensitivity and positive predictive value in endoleak detection. In the hospital vascular laboratory at a large tertiary care center, CDU cannot effectively replace CT scan in surveillance after EVAR.Duplex ultrasound evaluation of endoluminally treated aortic aneurysms with emphasis on diameter measurement: A comparison with computed tomography.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of color Doppler ultrasound (CDUS) for endoleak detection and measurement of the aneurysm diameter after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair.Forty-eight CDUS and computed tomographic angiography (CTA) examinations performed concurrently on 29 patients who were treated with endovascular stent grafts for abdominal aortic aneurysms were included in the study. CTA and CDUS findings were retrospectively compared for aneurysm diameter, patency of the graft, and the presence of leaks in the aneurysm's lumen (the so-called "endoleaks").The stent graft was patent in all patients. Including the follow-up examinations, endoleaks were detected in a total of 17 CTA studies. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for CDUS compared with CTA as the gold standard were 100%, 96%, 94.4%, and 100%, respectively. Kappa statistics showed a high level of agreement between CDUS ant CTA examinations (χ = 0.95). The aneurysm diameters measured with CDUS and CTA were significantly different, but within 5 mm of each other in 83% of patients.Provided that a strict CDUS protocol including spectral analysis of perigraft flow is used, CDUS is comparable to CTA for endoleak detection and measurement of the aneurysm diameter.Surveillance after EVAR based on duplex ultrasound and abdominal radiography.Computed tomography angiography (CTA) is considered the gold standard imaging technique for surveillance following endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR). Limitations of CTA include cost, risk of contrast nephropathy and radiation exposure. A modified surveillance protocol involving annual duplex ultrasound (DUS) and abdominal radiography (AXR) was introduced, with CTA performed only if abnormalities were identified or DUS was undiagnostic.Prospective records were maintained on patients undergoing infra-renal EVAR at a UK, tertiary referral centre. All patients enrolled with at least one-year follow-up were reviewed. Primary outcomes identified were aneurysm rupture and aneurysm-related complications. Secondary outcomes included number of CTAs avoided and cost.Median follow-up was 36 months (range 12-57) for 194 patients. The total number of sets of surveillance imaging was 412 of which 70 (17%) required CTA. Abnormalities were found in 30 patients, 18 confirmed by CTA. Eleven patients required secondary intervention, three initially identified by AXR, three by DUS, three by both DUS and AXR, and two by CTA following undiagnostic DUS. No patient presented with rupture or aneurysm-related complications not identified by modified surveillance. Mean annual savings were €223.EVAR surveillance based on DUS and AXR is feasible and safe. The complimentary nature of AXR and DUS is demonstrated.Follow-up evaluation of endoluminally treated abdominal aortic aneurysms with duplex ultrasonography: validation with computed tomography.A growing number of patients with abdominal aortic aneurysms are currently being offered endoluminal treatment. However, the incidence of endoleaks, stenosis, and thrombosis is around 25% to 30%. As a result, a strict post procedure imaging surveillance protocol is necessary. The purpose of this study was to compare duplex ultrasonography (DU) and computed tomography (CT) for the follow-up of endoluminally treated aortic aneurysms.A total of 89 patients were followed up with serial CT and DU at 1, 3, 6, 12, and 24 months after endoluminal treatment. Special attention was directed toward the presence of endoleaks and aneurysm diameter evolution. Preoperative CT and DU were also reviewed to assess aneurysm diameter correlation.With DU, 14 type I and 21 type II endoleaks were identified. In one case the DU did not visualize a type II endoleak present on CT, and CT did not confirm three type II leaks identified with DU. There was only one false positive for type I endoleak with DU. The sensitivity of DU was 96% with a specificity of 94%, when compared with CT. A linear regression analysis of the diameters obtained with DU and CT revealed a good correlation. However, variability was high, indicating poor agreement. Regarding diameter evolution, the range was identical in 45%, and the trend was similar in 73%. However, in 9% of the cases, DU showed a decrease in diameter, whereas CT showed a significant increase.DU is an accurate tool for the diagnosis of endoleaks, but is less valuable for diameter measurements, when compared with CT. Currently, DU is a useful tool, but CT remains a key part of the postoperative evaluation after endoluminal treatment of abdominal aortic aneurysms. At institutions where DU is used for follow-up, researchers should perform quality control studies to avoid potentially significant errors.Follow-up of aortic stent grafts: comparison of the volumetric analysis of the aneurysm sac by ultrasound and CT.The long-term follow-up of patients with endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) and a normal surgical risk was defined by the French National Authority for Health (Haute Autorité de Santé) in 2009. The monitoring of the volume of the aneurysm sac theoretically avoids the bias related to the measurement of its diameter alone. The objective of this study was to evaluate how reliable and reproducible the volumetric measurement of the aneurysm sac by ultrasound was compared with computerized tomography angiography (CTA).We carried out a retrospective diagnosis study of 75 consecutive patients treated with EVAR in our institution who were monitored with 3-dimensional ultrasonography (3DU) and CTA between January 2010 and December 2012. The measurement of the volume (cm(3)) of the aneurysm sac with a Toshiba Aplio XG ultrasound system equipped with a 3-MHz 3-dimensional probe was compared with the volume obtained by CTA. Interoperator reproducibility was studied in the last 45 enrolled patients; 2 different blinded operators made 2 volumetric measurements on the same patients, on the same day. An analysis of a 48-patient subgroup in which at least two 3DU were performed during follow-up was also carried out to determine the threshold value of the increase in the volume of the aneurysm sac, making it possible to suspect the presence of an endoleak.A total of 116 pairs of examinations were compared (the patients who had the longest postoperative follow-up had 4 pairs of compared examinations). The correlation between volumetric ultrasound and CTA measurements was excellent (r = 0.931; P < 0.0001) in the 116 pairs of examinations, and so was the reproducibility of volumetric echography (r = 0.949; P < 0.0001) in 45 patients. The subgroup study highlighted the fact that a 6.5-cm(3) increase of the aneurysm sac made it possible to suspect the presence of an endoleak in comparison with CTA as the gold standard (sensitivity and specificity were 85.7% and 85.3%, respectively). The area under the curve was 0.854 (95% confidence interval, 0.793-0.915). In the 116 examinations, a good correlation between volume and diameter was calculated with CTA (r = 0.733; P < 0.0001) and between ultrasound volumetric and CTA diameter (r = 0.660; P < 0.0001).Volumetric echography is comparable with CTA for the evaluation of the aneurysm sac after EVAR, reproducible and inexpensive. When a significant increase of the volume of the sac is detected by ultrasound, the examination can be supplemented by an injection of ultrasound contrast agent or by CTA to visualize an endoleak.Duplex ultrasound imaging alone is sufficient for midterm endovascular aneurysm repair surveillance: a cost analysis study and prospective comparison with computed tomography scan.Early in our experience with endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR) we performed both serial computed tomography scans and duplex ultrasound (DU) imaging in our post-EVAR surveillance regimen. Later we conducted a prospective study with DU imaging as the sole surveillance study and determined cost savings and outcome using this strategy.From September 21, 1998, to May 30, 2008, 250 patients underwent EVAR at our hospital. Before July 1, 2004, EVAR patients underwent CT and DU imaging performed every 6 months during the first year and then annually if no problems were identified (group 1). We compared aneurysm sac size, presence of endoleak, and graft patency between the two scanning modalities. After July 1, 2004, patients underwent surveillance using DU imaging as the sole surveillance study unless a problem was detected (group 2). CT and DU imaging charges for each regimen were compared using our 2008 health system pricing and Medicare reimbursements. All DU examinations were performed in our accredited noninvasive vascular laboratory by experienced technologists. Statistical analysis was performed using Pearson correlation coefficient.DU and CT scans were equivalent in determining aneurysm sac diameter after EVAR (P < .001). DU and CT were each as likely to falsely suggest an endoleak when none existed and were as likely to miss an endoleak. Using DU imaging alone would have reduced cost of EVAR surveillance by 29% ($534,356) in group 1. Cost savings of $1595 per patient per year were realized in group 2 by eliminating CT scan surveillance. None of the group 2 patients sustained an adverse event such as rupture, graft migration, or limb occlusion as a result of having DU imaging performed as the sole follow-up modality.Surveillance of EVAR patients can be performed accurately, safely, and cost-effectively with DU as the sole imaging study.Early follow-up after endovascular aneurysm repair: is the first postoperative computed tomographic angiography scan necessary?To examine whether initial postoperative computed tomographic angiography (CTA) is needed in all patients undergoing endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).A total of 105 consecutive patients underwent EVAR with standard infrarenal devices in our department between November 2009 and May 2011. Five patients were excluded due to severe renal insufficiency, leaving 100 (85 men; median age 73 years, range 46-91) eligible for prospective enrollment in a triple-modality early postoperative follow-up protocol [intraoperative completion angiography, postoperative duplex ultrasonography (DUS), and plain abdominal radiography). Findings were compared for sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value (PPV), and negative predictive value (NPV) against the first postoperative CTA results for the detection of endoleaks or other signs of EVAR failure.There were 10 inconclusive DUS examinations. In the remaining 90 patients, DUS had 75.0% sensitivity, 95.4% specificity, 85.7% PPV, and 91.5% NPV for the detection of endoleaks. The intraoperative angiogram, DUS, and abdominal radiograph combined resulted in 87.5% sensitivity and 95.4% specificity, with a 65.6% PPV and 94.8% NPV for the detection of endoleaks. In 2 patients who required a reintervention for endoleak in the early postoperative period, both endoleaks were correctly detected by the triple-modality early postoperative follow-up protocol.An early follow-up protocol consisting of an intraoperative completion angiogram, DUS, and abdominal radiograph shows a high sensitivity and NPV for the detection of endoleaks and should detect early migration or kinking of the stent-graft. An initial postoperative CTA is not necessary for most patients undergoing EVAR and should be reserved for those individuals in whom the aforementioned modalities are inconclusive or show signs of endoleak or other EVAR failure.Duplex ultrasound scanning is reliable in the detection of endoleak following endovascular aneurysm repair.To investigate the value of duplex ultrasound scanning (DUSS) in the routine follow up of patients following EVAR.Imaging was reviewed for 310 consecutive patients undergoing EVAR at a single centre. Concurrent ultrasound and CT scans were defined as having occurred within 6 months of each other. There were 244 paired concurrent DUSS and CT scans which were used for further analysis. These modalities were compared with respect to sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values and level of agreement (by Kappa statistics) using CT as the 'gold standard'.DUSS failed to detect a number of endoleaks which were seen on CT and the sensitivity of this test was therefore poor (67%). However, the specificity of DUSS compared more favourably with a value of 91%. Positive predictive values ranged from 33-100% but negative predictive values were more reliable with values of 91-100% at all time points post operatively. There were no type I leaks, or endoleaks requiring intervention which were missed on DUSS. Overall, there was a 'fair' level of agreement between the two imaging modalities using Kappa statistics.Although DUSS is not as sensitive as CT scanning in the detection of endoleak, no leaks requiring intervention were missed on DUSS in this study. DUSS is much cheaper than CT and avoids high doses of radiation. DUSS therefore remains a valuable method of follow up after EVAR and can reduce the need for repeated CT scans.Duplex ultrasound scanning versus computed tomographic angiography for postoperative evaluation of endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.The purpose of this study was to compare duplex ultrasound scanning and computed tomographic (CT) angiography for postoperative imaging and surveillance after endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA).One hundred consecutive patients with AAA underwent endovascular (Medtronic AneuRx, stent graft) aneurysm repair and were imaged with both CT angiography and duplex ultrasound scanning at regular intervals after the procedure. Each imaging modality was evaluated for technical adequacy and for documentation of aneurysm size, endoleak, and graft patency. In concurrent scan pairs, accuracy of duplex scanning was compared with CT.A total of 268 CT scans and 214 duplex scans were obtained at intervals of 1 to 30 months after endovascular aneurysm repair (mean follow-up interval, 9+/-7 months). All CT scans were technically adequate, and 198 (93%) of 214 duplex scans were technically adequate for the determination of aneurysm size, presence of endoleak, and graft patency. Concurrent (within 7 days of each other) scan pairs were obtained in 166 instances in 76 patients (1-6 per patient). The maximal transverse aneurysm sac diameter measured with both methods correlated closely (r = 0.93; P <.001) without a significant difference on paired analysis. In 92% of scans, measurements were within 5 mm of each other. Diagnosis of endoleak on both examinations correlated closely (P <.001), and compared with CT, duplex scanning had a sensitivity of 81%, a specificity of 95%, a positive predictive value of 94%, and a negative predictive value of 90%. Discordant results occurred in 8% of examinations, and in none of these was the endoleak close to the attachment sites or associated with aneurysm expansion. An endoleak was demonstrated on both tests in all eight patients who had an endoleak judged severe enough to warrant arteriography. Graft patency was documented in each instance, without discrepancy, with both modalities.High-quality duplex ultrasound scanning is comparable to CT angiography for the assessment of aneurysm size, endoleak, and graft patency after endovascular exclusion of AAA.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound versus color duplex ultrasound imaging in the follow-up of patients after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.This study assessed the negative predictive value, sensitivity, specificity, and diagnostic accuracy of real-time contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging (CEUS) in the detection of endoleaks in patients with abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) who underwent endovascular repair (EVAR) compared with unenhanced ultrasound imaging. Computed tomography angiography (CTA) was the gold standard. The secondary objective was to define the optimal dose of the second-generation contrast agent to routinely use in the CEUS examinations for endoleak detection.The study enrolled 84 patients with unruptured AAA who were treated with EVAR and underwent CTA follow-up. In the same day, CTA (4- x 1-mm collimation, 1.25-mm slice width), unenhanced US imaging and CEUS imaging was performed in all patients. The CEUS studies were performed after an intravenous bolus injection of 1.2 mL and 2.4 mL of a second-generation contrast agent with continuous low-mechanical index (range, 0.01-0.04) real-time tissue harmonic imaging. The unenhanced US and CEUS studies were interpreted separately by two independent experienced readers to detect the presence of endoleaks by viewing recorded videotapes according to a five-point confidence scale. The standard of reference was represented by the consensus reading of CTA performed by two experienced radiologists not involved in the image analysis. Qualitative analysis as well as sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, and diagnostic accuracy in detecting endoleaks of each reading session were compared.CEUS imaging significantly improved the diagnostic performance of unenhanced US studies in the detection of endoleaks in terms of sensitivity (97.5% vs 62.5%), negative predictive value (97.3% vs 65.1%), accuracy (89.3% vs 63.1%), and specificity (81.8% vs 63.6%). The optimal dose of contrast agent to detect and characterize endoleaks was 2.4 mL. No adverse events were recorded during the study.The results showed CEUS imaging is a fast, noninvasive, reliable, and valid alternative to multislice CTA for endoleak detection in endovascular aortic stent graft patients, and is superior to unenhanced US imaging. Contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging should be performed using a recommended contrast medium dose of 2.4 mL.Role of duplex scan in endoleak detection after endoluminal abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.to validate the role of duplex scan in endoleak detection in postoperative surveillance of endoluminal abdominal aneurysm repair (EAAR).between April 1997 and March 1999, 103 patients were eligible for duplex and computed tomography (CT) scan after EAAR. Mean follow-up was 8 months (range 1-24 months). The study protocol comprised concurrent examination with colour-duplex and CT scan at 1, 6, and 12 months after EAAR, for a total of 198 concurrent examinations. All duplex scan examinations were performed by two vascular surgeons with the same machine (ATL HDI 3000). Interobserver agreement in endoleak detection (kappa=1) and in type of endoleak (kappa=0.7) was evaluated in 50 random duplex examinations. Endoleak detection was examined comparatively in duplex and CT scan, the latter being the gold standard. Sensitivity and specificity tests together with negative- and positive-predictive values (NPV and PPV) were calculated.duplex scan was not feasible in one patient. On CT scan the endoleak rate was 4% at one month, 3% at 6 months, and 4% at one year. Overall, CT scan detected 12 endoleaks. With respect to endoleak detection, duplex scan revealed a great ability in ruling out false-negative results (sensitivity 91.7%, NPV 99.4%), but overestimated the presence of endoleak (specificity 98.4%, PPV 78. 6%). Regarding type of endoleak, the ability of duplex scan to identify the source of endoleak was low (sensitivity 66.7%).duplex scan, if validated, appears to be a reliable means for excluding the presence of endoleak after EAAR.Imaging of aortic lesions with color coded duplex sonography and contrast-enhanced ultrasound versus multislice computed tomography (MS-CT) angiography.The purpose of this study was to compare color coded duplex sonography (CCDS), contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) and multislice computed tomography (MS-CT) angiography in pathological aortic lesions.36 patients with a mean age of 71 years (range 51-87 yrs) with known or suspected treated and untreated aortic lesions detected by CTA were included in this prospective study. Standardized MS-CTA using a 16 or 64 row scanner (Somatom Sensation 16 or 64, Siemens Medical Systems, Forchheim, Germany) served as reference standard. The patients were examined with CCDS and CEUS (Logiq 9, General Electrics, Milwaukee, WI) using the low MI technique with intravenous injection of 1.6-2.4 ml SonoVue (Bracco, Italy). Contrast enhanced ultrasound was performed in the arterial, venous and late venous phase.In all patients CEUS resulted in a relevant diagnosis of an aortic pathology. In total, two covered ruptures, nine aortic dissections and five aortic aneurysms were detected. In the routine follow-up of 20 patients following endovascular repair (EVAR) of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA), one type 3 and three type 2 endoleaks after y-stent graft were detected. For presurgical planning, in addition to the perfused true and false lumen after dissection the perfusion of the renal arteries was examined.CEUS with SonoVue allows the evaluation of aortic lesions. It is an additional examination to CTA. It may allow a more rapid and noninvasive diagnosis, especially in critical patients from intensive care units because of its bedside availability. As the examination is dynamic, additional information about blood flow in the true and false lumen and about renal perfusion after dissections can be evaluated. Especially in patients with contraindications to CT contrast agents (e.g. due to renal failure or severe allergy), CEUS provides a good alternative to MS-CT.Defining a role for contrast-enhanced ultrasound in endovascular aneurysm repair surveillance.Endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) surveillance includes duplex ultrasound, abdominal radiography, and computed tomography angiography. Contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) has emerged as an additional modality whose role remains undefined. We evaluated whether a potential role for CEUS was the elucidation of unresolved issues following standard surveillance modalities.All patients undergoing EVAR at a tertiary referral center had surveillance based on plain abdominal radiograph and duplex ultrasound, with single arterial phase computed tomography angiography reserved for abnormalities or nondiagnostic imaging. In this prospective evaluation, from April 2010 to July 2011, discordance between imaging modalities or unresolved surveillance issues prompted CEUS. Cases and imaging were discussed in a multidisciplinary setting and outcomes recorded.During the study period, 539 patients underwent EVAR surveillance, of whom 33 (6%) had CEUS for unresolved issues (median age, 79; range, 66-90; 28 male). Median follow-up after EVAR was 23 months (range, 0-132). In all cases, CEUS was able to resolve the clinical issue, resulting in secondary intervention in 10 patients (30%). The remaining patients were returned to surveillance. Within the cohort of 33 patients, the clinical issues were categorized into three groups. Group 1: Endoleak of uncertain classification (n = 27: 21 type II, four type I, two had endoleak excluded). Group 2: Significant aneurysm expansion (≥ 5 mm) without apparent endoleak (n = 4: one type II, three had endoleak excluded). Group 3: Target vessel patency following fenestrated EVAR (n = 2: patency confirmed in both).CEUS can enhance EVAR surveillance through clarification of endoleak and target vessel patency when standard imaging modalities are not diagnostic.Improving the follow up after EVAR by using ultrasound image fusion of CEUS and MS-CT.To evaluate whether the image fusion with contrast enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) and CT affects the diagnosis of endoleaks in unclear cases.35 patients with follow-up examinations after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) were included in this retrospective study. Mean patient age was 73 years (range 54-83 y). B-scan, colour doppler and CEUS (1.2 ml SonoVue®, Bracco Imaging Germany) were performed in all patients by an experienced examiner using two different high-end ultrasound system (Siemens ACUSON S2000™, Siemens Healthcare, Erlangen, Germany or Logic E9, GE Healthcare, Milwaukee,WI, USA) with a multifrequency curved array transducer. The examiner was initially blinded to the CT results. Additional image fusion with CT-angiography (CTA) was then performed. The ultrasound examinations were later read by two blinded unbiased investigators with more than five years of clinical ultrasound in consensus.All patients were examined using all diagnostic ultrasound tools of the study. The results show that image fusion is easy and convenient to perform. Conventional ultrasound examination with B-scan and colour Doppler examination detected one Type I and one Type II endoleak, contrast enhanced ultrasound detected one Type I and three Type II endoleaks after EVAR whereas CTA depicted one Type I and two Type II endoleaks. Ultrasound image fusion with CT-angiography confirmed one Type I and three Type II endoleaks.In comparison to conventional ultrasound and CTA the use of CEUS improved the visualization and classification of endoleaks. CEUS shows even small blood flow which can be depicted due to the real time imaging of endoleaks. In unclear cases additional ultrasound image fusion with CEUS and CT angiography improves the visualisation of small endoleaks and this may cause a change in the follow-up interval. CEUS is a good alternative to CT in the detection and follow-up of endoleaks, especially in patients with contraindications to CT contrast agents due to allergies or renal failure, enabling reduced additional costs and exposure to radiation.Prospective comparative analysis of colour-Doppler ultrasound, contrast-enhanced ultrasound, computed tomography and magnetic resonance in detecting endoleak after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.To assess the accuracy of colour-Doppler ultrasound (CDUS), contrast-enhanced ultrasonography (CEUS), computed tomography angiography (CTA) and magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) in detecting endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR).Prospective, observational study.From December 2007 to April 2009, 108 consecutive patients who underwent EVAR were evaluated with CDUS, CEUS, CTA and MRA as well as angiography, if further treatment was necessary. Sensitivity, specificity, accuracy and negative predictive value of ultrasound examinations were compared with CTA and MRA as the reference standards, or with angiography when available.Twenty-four endoleaks (22%, type II: 22 cases, type III: two cases) were documented. Sensitivity and specificity of CDUS, CEUS, CTA, and MRA were 58% and 93%, 96% and 100%, 83% and 100% and 96% and 100% respectively. CEUS allowed better classification of endoleaks in 10, two and one patients compared with CDUS, CTA and MRA, respectively.The accuracy of CEUS in detecting endoleaks after EVAR is markedly better than CDUS and is similar to CTA and MRA. CEUS seems to be a feasible tool in the long-term surveillance after EVAR, and it may better classify endoleaks missed by other imaging techniques.Single-centre prospective comparison between contrast-enhanced ultrasound and computed tomography angiography after EVAR.To evaluate contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) as an effective alternative to CT-angiography (CTA) for endoleak detection and aneurismal sac diameter measurement in the follow-up after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR).From January 2006 to December 2010, 395 patients underwent EVAR follow-up with both CTA and CEUS. The diameter of the aneurismal sac and the presence of endoleaks were evaluated in all the 395 paired examinations.Bland-Altman plots showed a good agreement in aneurismal sac diameter evaluation between the two imaging modalities. The mean diameter was 54.93 mm (standard deviation (SD) ±12.57) with CEUS and 56.01 mm (SD ± 13.23) with CTA. The mean difference in aneurismal sac diameter was -1.08 mm ± 3.3543 (95% confidence interval (CI), -0.75 to -1.41), in favour of CTA. The number of observed agreement in endoleak detection was 359/395 (90.89%). The two modalities detected the same type I and type III endoleaks. McNemar's χ(2) test confirmed that CTA and CEUS are equivalent in endoleak detection.CEUS demonstrated to be as accurate as CTA in endoleak detection and abdominal aortic aneurysm diameter measurements during EVAR follow-up, without carrying the risks of radiation exposure or nephrotoxicity. Even if it cannot be proposed as the sole imaging modality during follow-up, our analysis suggests that it should have a major role.Comparison of color duplex ultrasound and computed tomography scan for surveillance after aortic endografting.Endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms (AAA) requires regular surveillance for early detection of endograft failure. CT scanning is the gold standard surveillance procedure. The purpose of this study was to assess the reliability of color duplex ultrasound (CDU) in comparison to CT scanning for detection of endoleaks and changes in aneurysmal diameter. From November 1996 to September 1999, a total of 41 patients treated by aortic endografting underwent regular surveillance with both CT scanning and CDU. There were 39 men and 2 women with a mean age of 71 years (range, 50-83). Endovascular treatment involved deployment of a straight aorto-aortic stent in 6 cases, bifurcated stent in 33, and aorta-to-unilateral iliac artery stent in 2. Stent deployment failed in one case; the procedure was conversion to open surgery. Primary or secondary endoleaks were detected in 17 patients (42%). Our findings indicated that CDU is less reliable than the CT scan for detection of endoleaks, but that reliability of CDU for surveillance of aneurysmal diameter is fair.A comparison between contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging and multislice computed tomography in detecting and classifying endoleaks in the follow-up after endovascular aneurysm repair.This study compared contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) imaging and multislice computed tomography (MS-CT) angiography in detecting and classifying endoleaks in the follow-up of patients after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).This retrospective study consisted of 171 patients with CEUS imaging and MS-CT angiography follow-up examinations after EVAR. During follow-up, 489 CEUS and 421 MS-CT examinations were assessed. B-scan, color Doppler, and CEUS imaging were performed in all patients. MS-CT was performed with a 16-slice up to 128-slice scanner.From the 132 patients in our cohort, we obtained 200 contemporary imaging examination pairs. MS-CT was used as the preferred examination in determining the presence of an endoleak. The true-positive rate for the detection of endoleaks with CEUS imaging was 42% (84 of 200), the false-positive rate was 4% (8 of 200), the true-negative rate was 52% (105 of 200), and the false-negative rate was 2% (3 of 200). The sensitivity of CEUS imaging was therefore 97%, and the specificity was 93%. The McNemar test value was 0.227, and the κ coefficient was 0.889.CEUS imaging appears to be as good as MS-CT angiography in the detection of endoleaks in the follow-up after EVAR, with the added advantages of no radiation dose and no nephrotoxicity of the contrast agents. A switch of the preferred examination from MS-CT to CEUS imaging should be considered.The incidence and natural history of type I and II endoleak: a 5-year follow-up assessment with color duplex ultrasound scan.The purpose of this study was the demonstration of the value of color duplex ultrasound (CDU) scanning in the detection of type I endoleak (T1EL) and type II endoleak (T2EL), the correlation of Doppler scan waveform pattern to endoleak persistence or seal, and the description of the natural history of endoleak.The study was a retrospective review of 83 patients who underwent periodic CDU scan and computed tomographic (CT) scan surveillance of the endograft and aneurysm sac after insertion of an aortic endograft for abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA). Forty-one patients (49%) with an endoleak at anytime in the follow-up period form the basis of this report.T1EL was detected in all five patients with CDU and CT scans. T2EL was detected in 36 patients with CDU scan as compared with 18 patients with CT scan. With CT scan, endoleak was not detected when CDU scan showed no endoleak. Conversely, all CT scan--detected endoleaks were found with CDU scanning. The T2EL source artery was identified with CT scan in seven patients, whereas the source was identified in all 36 patients with CDU scan. Endoleak source did not correlate with outcome (seal or persistence). However, a to/fro Doppler scan waveform pattern was associated with spontaneous T2EL seal in seven of 12 patients, and a monophasic or biphasic waveform was associated with endoleak persistence in 14 of 17 patients (P =.023, with chi(2) test). Thirteen of 36 T2ELs underwent spontaneous seal by 6.2 +/- 2.8 months. T2ELs without increasing AAA diameter were observed. Eight patients with persistent T2EL present for more than 12 months did not undergo treatment. However, two patients underwent T2EL obliteration with coils because of AAA sac enlargement. T1EL of the distal attachment site was the initial endoleak identified in five patients, but seven patients harboring T2ELs had subsequent T1ELs develop. For the entire 83 patients, the combined T1EL and T2EL prevalence rate was 20% of patients at a 6-month follow-up period, but this rate increased to 50% after 24 months. The incidence rate of newly detected endoleaks and of spontaneous sealing was 24.4% at 12 months and 12.5% in longer-term follow-up period.CDU scan is effective in the identification of the type of endoleak, the delineation of the vessel involved, and the hemodynamic information not available with any other testing method. Endoleaks have a dynamic natural history characterized by a variable onset with changing branch vessel involvement and spectral flow patterns. Periodic long-term endograft surveillance with CDU scanning is necessary for following existing endoleaks and for detecting new ones. Corroboration of these findings in larger multicenter prospective trials will be needed to determine whether CDU scan analysis of endoleaks would be predictive of long-term success in endovascular AAA repair.Ultrasound-determined diameter measurements are more accurate than axial computed tomography after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair.This study evaluated the correlation of ultrasound (US)-derived aortic aneurysm diameter measurements with centerline, three-dimensional (3-D) reconstruction computed tomography (CT) measurements after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR).Concurrent CT and US examinations from 82 patients undergoing post-EVAR surveillance were reviewed. The aortic aneurysm diameter was defined as the major axis on the centerline images of 3-D CT reconstruction. This was compared with US-derived minor and major axis measurements, as well as with the minor axis measurement on the conventional axial CT images. Correlation was evaluated with linear regression analyses. Agreement between different imaging modalities and measurements was assessed with Bland-Altman plots.The correlation coefficients from linear regression analyses were 0.92 between CT centerline major and US minor measurements, 0.94 between CT centerline major and US major measurements, and 0.93 between CT minor and centerline major measurements. Bland-Altman plots showed a mean difference of 0.11 mm between US major and CT centerline measurements compared with 5.38 mm between US minor and CT centerline measurements, and 4.25 mm between axial CT minor and centerline measurements. This suggested that, compared with axial CT and US minor axis measurements, US major axis measurements were in better agreement with CT centerline measurements. Variability between major and minor US and CT centerline diameter measurements was high (standard deviation of difference, 4.27-4.84 mm). However, high variability was also observed between axial CT measurements and centerline CT measurements (standard deviation of difference, 4.36 mm).The major axis aneurysm diameter measurement obtained by US imaging for surveillance after EVAR correlates well and is in better agreement with centerline 3-D CT reconstruction diameters than axial CT.Surveillance imaging modality does not affect detection rate of asymptomatic secondary interventions following EVAR.Literature reports that surveillance imaging following endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR) gives rise to asymptomatic secondary interventions (SI) in 1.4-9% of cases. This retrospective study aimed to evaluate whether the modality of surveillance imaging influences the detection rate of asymptomatic SI.Two EVAR surveillance protocols were compared at the same vascular centre. Protocol I, performed from January 2003 to December 2006, consisted of colour duplex ultrasound scan (CDU) plus CT angiography (CTA) 1 month after procedure and every 6 months thereafter. Protocol II, performed from January 2007 to June 2010, consisted of CDU plus CTA 1 month after operation and CDU plus plain abdominal films (XR) every 6 months thereafter. In the second protocol, CTA was carried out only during follow-up in specific conditions. The term 'asymptomatic SI' was used when the necessity for SI was detected by imaging alone on an elective basis, prior to development of any symptoms.Enrolment included 376 and 341 consecutive patients with a mean follow-up of 1148 days (range 1-3204 days) and 942 days (range1-1512 days) in Protocols I and II, respectively (p < 0.001). Freedom rates from aneurysmal rupture, freedom from SI and detection rate for asymptomatic SI at 3 years were 98.3% and 98.7% (p = 0.456), 82% and 83.5%(p = 0.876) and 8.8% (n = 33/376) and 8.5%(n = 25/341) (p = 0.49) in Protocols I and II, respectively. Estimated comparison of the costs, radiation exposure and contrast used at 3 years in Protocol I versus Protocol II showed that Protocol II allowed for a three-, four- and six fold reduction in overall costs, radiation exposure and contrast used, respectively (p < 0.0001).The detection rate of asymptomatic SI following EVAR is not affected by the type of surveillance imaging. A surveillance schedule based primarily on CDU and XR appears to be justified.The use of color-flow duplex scan for the detection of endoleaks.Computed tomographic (CT) scan represents the criterion standard for surveillance of endoleaks after endoluminal repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms (erAAAs). Given need for surveillance, risks, and expense of CT scan, the accuracy of color-flow duplex (CFD) scan after erAAA was determined.During a 43-month period, patients enrolled in phase II and III of the AneuRx Multicenter Clinical Trial at our institution underwent CFD scan 1 month after erAAA. Patients with CFD scan results that were positive for endoleak underwent CT scanning at 3 months after erAAA, and those with CFD scan results that were negative for endoleak underwent CT scanning at 6 months after erAAA.Seven of 79 patients (9%) who underwent CFD and CT scanning had the diagnosis of endoleak. All endoleaks that were diagnosed with CT scan were detected with CFD scan. One patient had positive results for endoleak with CFD scan at 1 month and then negative results with CT scan at 3 months. Although this may represent resolution of endoleak, this case was counted as a false-positive result. When compared with CT scan, CFD scan had a sensitivity of 100%, specificity of 99%, positive predictive value of 88%, negative predictive value of 100%, and accuracy of 99%.CFD scan is an accurate test for the detection of endoleak after erAAA. In addition, most endoleaks diagnosed with CFD scan at 1 month continued to be present at 6 months. This important finding increases the emphasis on the use of this noninvasive test and may initiate earlier intervention of endoleak.[Duplex ultrasound detection of type II endoleaks by after endovascular aneurysm repair: interest of contrast enhancement].Type II endoleaks (EFII) are related to retrograde flow via aorta tributaries. They are the most frequent complication after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR). We hypothesized that the use of contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) by an experienced vascular physician could increase the sensitivity of detecting EFII compared with computed tomography angiography (CTA) taken as the gold standard.From November 2010 to February 2013, patients with EVAR were included prospectively. All patients had a color duplex ultrasound (CDU), CEUS and CTA. Sensitivity, specificity and kappa's coefficient were determined to estimate the performance of CDU and CEUS to assess EFII compared with CTA.Sixty CDU and 60 CEUS explorations were compared to 60 CTA explorations. Nineteen type EFII were detected by CTA, 14 by CDU and 15 by CEUS. CDU sensitivity was 74% (κ=0.75), and CEUS sensitivity was 78% (κ=0.8). Both tests exhibited 97% specificity. There was good agreement between CDU results (κ=0.75) and CEUS results (κ=0.8) compared with CTA. There was very good agreement between CDU and CEUS results for detection of EFII (κ=0.93). There was no statistically significant difference between the sensitivity of CDU and CEUS (P=0.32).Our results suggest that contrast enhancement does not increase yield for ultrasound detection of type II endoleaks when performed by an experienced vascular physician.Endoleak after endovascular aneurysm repair: duplex ultrasound imaging is better than computed tomography at determining the need for intervention.Color duplex ultrasound (CDU) imaging is a noninvasive alternative to computed tomography (CT) for the detection of endoleak. This study compared CT and CDU imaging in the detection of endoleaks requiring intervention after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).All EVARs performed at our institution from 1996 to 2007 were retrospectively reviewed. CDU and CT scans < or =3 months were paired and the presence of an endoleak and its type were recorded. Clinical follow-up was reviewed and interventions for endoleak were recorded. Interventions were performed for type I, for type II with sac enlargement, and for type III endoleaks. The first analysis of clinical test outcomes used the findings of CT scan as a gold standard and the second used the findings at time of intervention as a gold standard.During the time period reviewed, 496 patients underwent EVAR, and 236 of these had CDU and CT follow-up studies paired < or =3 months of each other. Mean follow-up was 17 months (range, <1-111 months). We reviewed 944 studies or 472 pairs. Eighteen patients (7.6%) required intervention for 19 endoleaks: six type I, 11 type II, and two type III. Early endoleak (< or =1 month) requiring reintervention was detected in 1 vs late endoleak (mean, 28 months; range, 0.6-88 months) in 18. All type I and III endoleaks were treated with endovascular cuff or limb extension placement. Three type II endoleaks were treated with open ligation, and coil or glue embolization was used in eight. CDU imaging detected endoleaks requiring intervention in 89% of cases, whereas CT detected endoleak in 58% (P < .05). The ability to correctly identify the type of endoleak as confirmed at time of intervention was 74% with CDU imaging vs 42% by CT (P < .05). CDU, for the detection of endoleak requiring intervention, had a sensitivity of 90%, specificity of 81%, negative predictive value (NPV) of 99%, and positive predictive value (PPV) of 16%, while CT had a sensitivity of 58%, specificity of 87%, NPV of 98%, and PPV of 15%.CDU imaging has a high sensitivity in detecting endoleaks requiring intervention, is better at identifying the type of endoleak, and is an excellent test for graft surveillance after endovascular aneurysm repair. Compared with CT scan, CDU imaging in our experience is the preferred test on which to base an intervention for endoleak.Contrast ultrasound imaging: the best method to detect type II endoleak during endovascular aneurysm repair follow-up.Type II endoleak is the most common complication after endovascular aneurysm repair and require close surveillance. Hence, the need to validate new techniques as alternative to helical CT-scan, the reference standard. The aim of this study is to evaluate the efficacy of Cadence Contrast Pulse Sequencing ultrasound technique with second generation contrast agents in detecting endoleaks, and to compare the results with data obtained from CTA.30 patients with endovascular stent grafts, during their regular follow-up consisting in serial CT and ultrasound exams performed at discharge, at one and six months and at one year thereafter, previous informed consent, were enrolled in a prospectic double blind study design in order to compare triphasic helical CT-scan to another adjunctive ultrasound investigation (Cadence CPS technique with Sono Vue). No more than 15 days occurred between the two examinations. In the study were evaluated only data obtained from the comparison of the two concomitant investigations, independently from the follow-up. Variables analysed were changes in the maximum diameter of the aneurysmal sac, presence and type of endoleak, if detected. In the case of disagreement between the two diagnostic tools angiography was performed.One patient dropped out because of violation of the study protocol (a stroke occurred in the time interval between the two investigations). Both exams visualised patency and proper graft placement in all the remaining patients. Aneurysmal diameters with both investigations overlapped (r(s):0.98). In 21 patients no endoleak was detected with a significant aneurysmal sac shrinkage (P<0.001). In seven patients both methods confirmed presence of endoleak. Ultrasonography detected all type of endoleaks, while CT-scan was uncertain in one. Moreover, in one patient CT-angiography showed an increased aneurysmal diameter without other evidence, while a contrast ultrasound investigation disclosed a type II low-flow endoleak, confirmed by angiography.The Cadence Contrast Pulse Sequencing with echo contrast agent is an ultrasound technique that substantially improves the ultrasound diagnostic reliability.Evaluating outcomes of endoleak discrepancies between computed tomography scan and ultrasound imaging after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair.Endovascular repair for abdominal aortic aneurysm (EVAR) requires regular surveillance to ensure long-term durability. To understand the clinical consequence of discrepancies in endoleak detection between computed tomographic angiography (CTA) and duplex ultrasound (DUS) imaging, this study evaluated patients who underwent EVAR. The aim of the present study was to determine whether these discrepancies affected the long-term outcome after EVAR, and whether DUS predicted the need for re-intervention on the basis of other markers despite missing endoleaks.A review of the prospectively maintained database was completed to capture all EVAR procedures performed between October 1999 and June 2009. Patients were routinely evaluated with computed tomography (CT) and DUS imaging within 30 days after the procedure and intermittently at 6-12 month intervals after treatment. DUS imaging was evaluated with attention toward maximum aneurysm diameter, presence of an endoleak, and compared with findings on simultaneous contrast CT imaging.The database and patient records identified 1,062 EVARs in 992 patients who underwent 3,120 imaging encounters through the surveillance protocol. Of these 3,120 encounters, 610 had both CT scan and ultrasound at the same visit. Contrast material was not used in 49 CT scans, leaving 561 encounters for comparing contrast CT imaging with DUS results. CT and DUS detection of endoleaks correlated in 442 encounters (78.8%). Discrepancies occurred in 119 encounters (21.2%) as follows: CT scan only endoleak in 17.8% (N = 100; type I = 6, type II = 91, and type III = 3) and DUS only endoleak in 3.4% (N = 19; type II = 19) encounters. Of these 119 encounters, 99 (17.6%) did not require secondary interventions. Eventually, 15 patients required intervention after 20 discrepancy encounters (3.6%): 11 patients continued with the surveillance protocol through CT or DUS imaging, whereas four were observed by CT imaging only. Considering these 11 patients, DUS eventually detected an endoleak on subsequent visits in five patients, DUS identified an increase in aneurysm diameter in four patients, and DUS never identified the type II endoleaks in two patients. When the endoleak raised concern or the aneurysm enlarged, we undertook 19 secondary interventions in these 15 patients: vessel embolization (N = 8), iliac extenders (N = 5), graft relining (N = 3), graft explants (N = 2), and proximal cuff (N = 1). Although three ruptures occurred in our entire treatment experience, no ruptures occurred in patients who maintained the prescribed surveillance protocol.Surveillance after EVAR is necessary because secondary interventions are sometimes required. Although DUS has lower sensitivity in detecting endoleaks, comparison with CT findings can identify the appropriate patients for DUS surveillance only. Even considering the discrepancies between CT imaging and DUS, repeated DUS surveillance might identify an unstable aneurysm that requires further intervention. Although DUS has not been established as an exclusive surveillance tool, it can be used to effectively monitor patients after EVAR with reduced need for CT imaging.Contrast harmonic imaging ultrasound and perfusion imaging for surveillance after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair regarding detection and characterization of suspected endoleaks.Is Contrast Harmonic Imaging (CHI) comparable to computed tomography angiography (CTA) scan in detecting and characterizing suspected endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair in a non-selected group including reintervention procedure and branched endografts in daily practice?In a prospective study computed tomography angiography (CTA) and contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) were performed in 30 consecutive patients (26 males, 4 females, mean age: 72 years, range: 38-87) with suspected endoleaks in follow-up (mean 13 months, range: 1-95) after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair or procedure in dissection or penetrated ulcer of the aorta (25 infrarenal, 5 suprarenal stent grafts, mean aortic diameter 56 mm, range: 27-98). CTA was supposed to be gold standard for determining the presence of endoleaks (multislice CT, collimation 16 x 0.75 mm, 100 ml of iodized contrast agent bolus). Ultrasonography used a multi-frequency probe (1-4 MHz) with the modalities of colour coded Doppler sonography (CCDS), power Doppler (PD) combined with contrast enhancement and the technique of contrast harmonic imaging (CHI) and low mechanical index (MI < 0.2). 2.4 ml of SonoVue (Bracco, Altana Pharma GmbH, Italy) were administered to each patient intravenously as a bolus injection.Out of 30 patients, 21 endoleaks were identified in CTA (6 type I or III, 15 type II), 22 in CHI. Thus, sensitivity for CHI was therefore 99%, its specificity 85% (Spearman correlation coefficient (CC) 0.92). In follow-up the localizations of endoleak type I or III exclusively detected by CHI were confirmed as true positive by angiography. Due to its dynamic characteristic CHI seemed to be more helpful in characterization of endoleaks than CTA. In case of a rupture after reintervention a type III endoleak leads to prompt intervention before receiving the result of the CT scan. Altogether, CHI failed to identify 1 combined type I and II endoleak (sensitivity 0.99). Both, CCDS and PD were positive only in 6/30 patients (CC 0.33 and 0.39). Interestingly the application of contrast agent doubles the detection rate of endoleaks (12/30) in CCDS and PD (CC 0.39).Contrast harmonic imaging (CHI) compared to computed tomography angiography (CTA) accurately depicts endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aneurysm repair and stent-graft procedure in dissected and ulcerated aorta. It seems to be superior in characterization of the type of endoleaks and can be established in order to reduce iodized contrast agent and radiation exposure in follow-up. In contrast to CTA scan CHI can be offered to patients with chronic renal insufficiency and allows a dynamic examination and a perfusion analysis.3D contrast enhanced ultrasound for detecting endoleak following endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).CT angiography (CTA) for endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) surveillance involves irradiation and nephrotoxic X-ray contrast agents. Three-dimensional contrast enhanced ultrasound (3D CEUS) is a novel imaging technique that may be more sensitive to blood flow detection than CTA or 2D CEUS. 3D CEUS utilises positional information from magnetic field emitters to assemble all ultrasound reflections into a high-definition image. We compared 3D CEUS with CTA for the detection of endoleak and aneurysm expansion following EVAR.3D CEUS (Curefab), 2D CEUS (Philips IU22), and CTA were compared in 30-paired images from 23 patients. Sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive value were calculated for 2D and 3D CEUS against CTA as the 'gold standard'. Pearson correlation was used to compare aneurysm sac diameter. Data were analysed using SPSS version 19.0.30 paired 3D CEUS and CTA images were analysed from 23 patients. Endoleaks were detected in 17 images with CTA, 18 on 2D CEUS, and 18 on 3D CEUS. The sensitivity, specificity, positive, and negative predictive values of 3D CEUS to detect endoleak were 100%, 92%, 94%, and 100%, respectively. There was excellent correlation (r=0.935; p≤.0001) between CTA and 3D CEUS for AAA sac diameter. Only 3D CEUS detected the inflow and outflow arteries in all 18 scans with endoleak. 2D CEUS detected the inflow in 16 (88.8%) and CTA on 12 (66.6%) of the images.3D CEUS may be more sensitive to endoleak following EVAR than either 2D CEUS or CTA.Time-resolved CT angiography for the detection and classification of endoleaks.To assess the feasibility and diagnostic performance of time-resolved computed tomographic (CT) angiography in the detection and classification of endoleaks after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR) in high-risk patients.The study was approved by our ethics committee. Written informed consent was obtained from all participating patients. Fifty-four patients (42 male and 12 female patients; mean age, 70.9 years ± 9.3 [standard deviation]) with either thoracic (n = 8) or abdominal (n = 46) aortic aneurysms treated with a stent-graft were prospectively included. The patients were examined with a time-resolved CT angiographic protocol consisting of 12 low-dose phases (80 kVp; 120 mAs [effective]; scan range, 27 cm), with 60 mL of iomeprol. Patients with abdominal aneurysm repair also underwent contrast material-enhanced (CE) ultrasonography (US). The time delay between contrast enhancement within the stent lumen and the endoleak was measured. Effective radiation dose was calculated from the scanner protocols. Measures of diagnostic performance for the detection of endoleaks were calculated for time-resolved CT angiography, with CE US serving as the reference standard.All time-resolved CT angiographic data sets were diagnostic. Mean effective radiation dose was 14.6 mSv. Four thoracic and 19 abdominal endoleaks were identified by using time-resolved CT angiography. Seventeen of 19 abdominal endoleaks were confirmed with CE US. This rate resulted in a sensitivity of 94%, a specificity of 93%, a positive predictive value of 89%, and a negative predictive value of 96% for time-resolved CT angiography after abdominal EVAR. Type I endoleaks showed significantly earlier mean peak contrast enhancement (0.28 second ± 0.83) compared with that for type II endoleaks (9.17 seconds ± 3.59, P < .0001).Time-resolved CT angiography with 12 low-dose phases is feasible for patients after thoracic and abdominal EVAR. The protocol approximates the radiation dose of standard triphasic protocols. Its dynamic information differentiates types of endoleaks and shows high diagnostic performance.Duplex ultrasound scanning (DUS) versus computed tomography angiography (CTA) in the follow-up after EVAR.Computed tomography angiography (CTA) is the gold standard follow-up modality after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR). A potential alternative noninvasive and less expensive modality is duplex ultrasound scanning (DUS).We studied 314 follow-up paired scans (DUS and CTA) in 59 patients with EVAR.Endoleak--Endoleak was detected in 23.7% patients. The sensitivity and specificity rates of DUS were 54% and 95.3%, respectively. All 9 endoleaks that needed secondary intervention were detected on DUS. Eight of those were identified within a year after EVAR. Sac size--The mean difference in maximum diameter between the DUS and CTA was < or =5 mm in 84.5% of cases and < or =10 mm in 97.1%. Graft patency--There was 100% agreement between CTA and DUS.Duplex ultrasound scanning was reliable as it detected all the leaks that needed reintervention after EVAR. Duplex ultrasound scanning showed similar results to CTA in detecting sac size and patency.Use of colour duplex ultrasound as a first line surveillance tool following EVAR is associated with a reduction in cost without compromising accuracy.CT scanning remains the postoperative surveillance imaging modality of choice following EVAR. Concerns regarding cost, exposure to ionising radiation and intravenous contrast have led to a search for a less expensive, equally efficacious and safer method of monitoring EVAR patients after endograft deployment. This study evaluated the cost saving obtained if CDUS was employed as a first line surveillance tool following EVAR, as well as comparing the two entities in terms of efficacy.Postoperative surveillance CTs and CDUS scans in the 145 patients who have undergone EVAR from 1st June 2003 to 1st July 2010 were compared for the detection of endoleak and determination of residual sac size.Adopting a protocol where CDUS was employed as the first line surveillance tool following EVAR would result in a reduction in the number of postoperative CTs required in 2010 from 235 to 36. Based on 2010 costings, this would equate to an estimated reduction in expenditure from €117,500 to €34,915 a saving of €82,585. CDUS had a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 85% in the detection of endoleaks compared to CT. The positive predictive value was 28% and negative predictive value 100%. The Pearson Coefficient correlation of 0.96 indicates a large degree of correlation between CDUS and CT when measuring residual aneurysm size following EVAR.CDUS can replace CT as the first line surveillance tool following EVAR. This is associated with a significant reduction in the cost of surveillance without any loss of imaging accuracy.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound versus computed tomographic angiography for surveillance of endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.To compare diagnostic accuracy between contrast-enhanced ultrasound (US) and computed tomographic (CT) angiography to detect changes in abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) size and endoleaks during follow-up after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR).Between May 2006 and December 2008, 83 patients were consecutively enrolled for contrast-enhanced US and CT angiography imaging during surveillance after EVAR, yielding 127 paired examinations. Comparative analysis was performed for the anteroposterior and transverse maximal diameters of the aneurysm sac and for the presence or absence of endoleak, as determined by US and CT angiography.Contrast-enhanced US demonstrated significantly more endoleaks, predominantly of type II, compared with CT angiography (53% vs 22% of cases). The number of observed agreements was 77 of 127 (61%), indicating a low level of agreement (kappa value of 0.237). US was as accurate as CT angiography in the assessment of maximal aneurysm sac diameters, as shown by Bland-Altman analyses and low coefficients of variation (8.0% and 8.6%, respectively). The interobserver variability for AAA size measurement by US was low, given the interclass correlation coefficients of 0.99 and 0.98 for anteroposterior and transverse maximal diameters, respectively.Contrast-enhanced US may be an alternative to CT angiography in the follow-up of patients after EVAR. As US reduces exposure to the biologic hazards associated with lifelong annual CT angiography, including cumulative radiation dose and nephrotoxic contrast agent load, contrast-enhanced US might be considered as a substitute for CT angiography in the surveillance of patients after EVAR.Efficacy of ultrasound scan contrast agents in the noninvasive follow-up of aortic stent grafts.Computed tomographic angiography (CTA) is currently the most commonly used technique for postoperative surveillance to detect endoleaks after endovascular stent graft repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms. We have evaluated the efficacy of duplex ultrasound scan with the addition of an ultrasound scan contrast agent in documenting endoleaks and compared these results with CTA.Conventional duplex ultrasound scan with color Doppler imaging (CDI) was first done as part of routine postoperative surveillance. After the CDI study, a 1-mL bolus of ultrasound scan contrast was given via an antecubital vein, followed by a 5-mL flush with normal saline solution. The duplex ultrasound scan evaluation of the stent graft was repeated once the contrast agent was circulating throughout the blood pool, with tissue harmonic imaging to optimize visualization of the contrast agent. Status of the stent graft, the presence or absence of any endoleak, and whether these endoleaks were graft related (group I) or arterial branch related (group II) were recorded. Findings were compared with CTA studies done within a 2-week period of the ultrasound scan examination.Twenty patients were evaluated, 18 with modular stent grafts and two with unibody bifurcated stent grafts. Patients had a mean age of 74.5 +/- 7.6 years; 19 were male, with only one female. All stent grafts remained widely patent with normal aortoiliac flow hemodynamics. Duplex ultrasound scan with contrast identified all eight of the endoleaks seen with CTA and was able to determine whether they were group I or group II leaks. In two patients, ultrasound scan with contrast detected small endoleaks at the proximal graft attachment site, with extravasation of contrast into the aneurysm sac during systole. These endoleaks were not seen with CTA but were confirmed with conventional angiography at the time of endovascular closure. Standard duplex ultrasound scan with CDI failed to identify four of the 10 endoleaks in patients with technically difficult conditions.Duplex ultrasound scan, when used with an intravenously administered ultrasound scan contrast agent in the noninvasive follow-up of patients with aortic stent grafts, appears to provide good sensitivity to the presence and type of endoleaks, even in patients with technically difficult conditions not amenable to conventional duplex ultrasound scan with CDI.Ultrasound surveillance of endovascular aneurysm repair: a safe modality versus computed tomography.Routine ultrasound surveillance is adequate and safe for monitoring endovascular aneurysm repairs (EVARs). A retrospective chart review including 160 endograft patients was performed from August 2000 to September 2005. All ultrasound examinations (n = 359) were performed by a board-certified vascular surgery group's accredited laboratory. Registered vascular technologists utilized the same equipment consisting of Siemens Antares high-definition ultrasonography with tissue harmonics and color flow Doppler. An identical protocol was followed by each technologist: scan body and both limbs of the endograft and distal iliac vessels, measure anterior-posterior aneurysm sac size, and detect intrasac pulsatility and color flow. Statistical analysis utilized Pearson's correlation coefficient and the paired t-test. Forty-one endoleaks were discovered out of the 359 exams (11.4%). There were type I (7, 17%), type II (26, 63%), and combined type I with type II (8, 20%) endoleaks. Correlation with computed tomography (CT) was obtained in 35 of these cases. CT discovered three endoleaks that were not seen with ultrasound. However, these particular ultrasound exams were inadequate due to additional factors (bowel gas, body habitus, hernia), which prompted CT investigation and, hence, endoleak discovery. Of the 41 endoleaks found on ultrasound, only 14 were seen on CT. Specifically, 26 type II endoleaks were seen with ultrasound versus only nine during CT. Additional factors addressed included comparison between ultrasound and CT of residual aneurysm sac measurements and conditions limiting ultrasound examination. Although criticized in the past, color flow ultrasonography is a safe and effective modality for surveillance of aortic endografts. Utilizing ultrasound to analyze abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) sac dimensions and endoleak detection is statistically sound for screening AAA status post-EVAR.Could four-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasound replace computed tomography angiography during follow up of fenestrated endografts? Results of a preliminary experience.To evaluate four-dimensional contrast-enhanced ultrasound (4D-CEUS) as an alternative imaging method to computed tomography angiography (CTA) during follow up of fenestrated endovascular aneurysm repair (FEVAR) for juxta- and para-renal abdominal aortic aneurysms (AAA).Between October 2011 and March 2012, all consecutive patients who underwent FEVAR follow up were included in the study and evaluated with both 4D-CEUS and CTA. The interval between the two examinations was always ≤ 30 days. Endpoints were the comparison of postoperative AAA diameter, AAA volume, presence of endoleaks, revascularized visceral vessel (RVV) visualization, and patency. Comparative analysis was performed using Bland-Altman plots and McNemar's Chi-square test.Twenty-two patients (96% male, 4% female; mean age 74 ± 7 years; American Society of Anesthesiologists grade III/IV 82%/18%) were enrolled. Seventy-eight RVV (fenestrations: 60; scallops: 17; branches: 1) were analyzed. The mean AAA diameter evaluated by 4D-CEUS and CTA was 45 ± 10 mm (range 30-69 mm) and 48 ± 9 mm (range 32-70 mm), respectively. The mean difference was 3 ± 3 mm. The mean AAA volume evaluated by 4D-CEUS and CTA was 150 ± 7 cc (range 88-300 cc) and 159 ± 68 cc (range 80-310 cc), respectively. The mean difference was 7 ± 4 cc; a Bland-Altman plot revealed agreement in AAA diameter and volume evaluation (p < .01) between 4D-CEUS and CTA. The observed agreement for the detection of endoleaks was 95%. McNemar's Chi-square test confirmed that 4D-CEUS and CTA were equivalent (p > .05) at detecting endoleaks. The first segment of six (8%) RVVs (four renal and two superior mesenteric arteries) was not directly visualized by 4D-CEUS owing to obesity, but the contrast enhancement into the distal part of vessel or into the relative parenchyma gave indirect information about their patency. McNemar's Chi-square test demonstrated the superiority of CTA (p = .031) in visualizing RVVs. The patency of 77/78 RVVs was confirmed with both techniques. McNemar's Chi-square test confirmed that 4D-CEUS and CTA were equivalent in their ability to detect visceral vessel patency.The data suggest that 4D-CEUS is as accurate as CTA in the evaluation of postoperative AAA diameter and volume, endoleak detection, and RVV patency after FEVAR. Four-dimensional CEUS could provide hemodynamic information regarding RVVs, and reduce radiation exposure and renal impairment during follow up. Obesity limits the diagnostic accuracy of 4D-CEUS.Color duplex ultrasound and contrast-enhanced ultrasound in comparison to MS-CT in the detection of endoleak following endovascular aneurysm repair.The purpose of this study was to compare Color Duplex Ultrasound (CDU), Contrast-Enhanced Ultrasound (CEUS) and Multislice Computed Tomography (MS-CT) angiography in the routine follow up of patients following Endovascular Repair (EVAR) of Abdominal Aortic Aneurysm (AAA).43 consecutive patients with AAA underwent endovascular aneurysm repair and were imaged with CDU, CEUS and MS-CT angiography at regular intervals after the procedure. Each imaging modality was evaluated for the detection of endoleaks. The presence of endoleaks was analyzed and the conspicuity of findings was assessed.CTA was used as gold standard in determining the presence of endoleaks. CDU was true positive for endoleaks in 5/43 patients (11.6%) and false positive for endoleaks in 2/43 patients (4.6%). The sensitivity of CDU was therefore 33.3% and its specificity 92.8%; the positive and negative predictive values were 0.71 and 0.72, respectively. CEUS was true positive for the detection of endoleaks in 15/43 patients (34.9%) and false positive in 2/43 patients (4.6%). The sensitivity of CEUS was therefore 100% and its specificity 93%; the positive and negative predictive values were 0.88 and 1. In the follow up the two false positive endoleaks in CEUS were confirmed as true positive endoleaks by CEUS and MS-CT. In our small patient group, contrast-enhanced ultrasound seemed to be more accurately in demonstrating endoleaks after EVAR than MS-CT angiography and may be considered as a primary surveillance modality whereas duplex ultrasound scanning alone is not as sensitive as CEUS and MS-CT angiography in detection of endoleaks. Especially in patients with contraindications for CT contrast agents (e.g. due to renal failure or severe allergy) CEUS provides a good alternative to MS-CT.Postoperative color flow duplex scanning in aortic endografting.To report the feasibility and sensitivity of duplex sonography compared to computed tomography (CT) for aortic endograft follow-up surveillance.In a 26-month period, 113 aortic aneurysm patients received 79 tube and 34 bifurcated stent-grafts. Follow-up used contrast-enhanced CT scanning and duplex sonography with an intravenous ultrasound contrast agent (Levovist).Eleven patients (9.7%) were converted to open repair; 1 died from hemorrhagic shock secondary to retroperitoneal hematoma. The mean follow-up time was 7.2 months (range 1 to 24), during which 5 patients died of unrelated causes. Sixteen primary (within 30 days) and 5 secondary endoleaks were detected by duplex after tube graft implantation. Among 5 endoleaks due to retrograde side-branch perfusion, 3 were detected only with contrast-enhanced duplex scanning. Iliac artery occlusion was also documented using duplex; however, 2 stent fractures could not be seen with ultrasound. Ten primary endoleaks were detected in bifurcated stent-graft patients. One endoleak originating from the distal iliac limb anchoring site was missed by duplex owing to bowel gas. Graft limb thrombosis was clearly identified by lack of a flow signal on duplex.Duplex sonography could be a valuable, reliable, and economical surveillance tool for endovascular aortic reconstructions. The adjunctive use of an intravenous ultrasound contrast agent increased the sensitivity for detecting endoleak to a level comparable to contrast-enhanced CT scanning. However, stent fractures may not be seen on ultrasound, and bowel gas can interfere with obtaining an adequate image.Classification of endoleaks in the follow-up after EVAR using the time-to-peak of the contrast agent in CEUS examinations.To evaluate the feasibility of the classification of endoleaks following endovascular aortic aneurysm repair using the time-to-peak of the contrast agent in CEUS examinations.In this retrospective study, a cohort of 171 patients with a total of 489 CEUS follow-up examinations after EVAR were included. In 254 of the 489 examinations, an endoleak was seen and the time-to-peak was measured in seconds. Existence of an endoleak was confirmed by CT as the gold standard.We evaluated 254 CEUS video sequences showing an endoleak out of a total of 489 examinations. Kruskal-Wallis test revealed with p = 0.001 differences between the single endoleak types based on the time to peak. Correction after Bonferroni showed significant differences between type Ia compared to Ib and to IIa over inferior mesenteric artery (IMA) and IIa over lumbar artery (LA). There are also disparities between type Ib and type IIa IMA and type III, furthermore between type IIa IMA compared to IIa LA and type III as well as type IIa LA matched to type III.CEUS is an important method for the follow-up after EVAR. The time-to-peak does not seem to be a useful additional feature in classifying endoleaks, although there are differences between the time-to-peak of the single endoleak types and it is possible to make an order of the different endoleak types referring to the mean values.Application of duplex US for characterization of endoleaks in abdominal aortic stent-grafts: report of five cases.Endoleaks were detected with helical computed tomographic (CT) angiography in five patients after placement of an aortobiliac stent-graft. The leaks were subsequently evaluated with duplex ultrasonography (US) and, in four patients, with conventional aortography as well. CT angiography revealed a total of seven endoleaks, all of which were prospectively classified as reconstitution (type II) leaks. Duplex US demonstrated six of the seven endoleaks. At duplex US, two of the leaks were characterized as attachment-site (type I) leaks; these two diagnoses were confirmed during subsequent angiography and profoundly altered clinical care. As an adjunct to CT angiography in evaluating endoleaks, duplex US provides hemodynamic information that enables further characterization of the type of endoleak and facilitates appropriate clinical care.Endoleak after aortic stent graft repair: diagnosis by color duplex ultrasound scan versus computed tomography scan.The purpose of this study was to compare the accuracy of a color duplex ultrasound scan (CDU) to a computerized axial tomography scan (CT) in the diagnosis of endoleaks after stent graft repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms.The Endovascular Aneurysm Clinical Trial Core Laboratory records were reviewed from 117 concurrent CDU and CT studies that were performed in 79 patients who were implanted with the Endovascular Technologies stent graft device between December 1995 and January 1997. All of the studies were interpreted by the Core Laboratory as having the presence or the absence of an endoleak or as being indeterminate because of technical factors. Of the 117 videotaped CDU studies available for reexamination, 100 were reassessed for technical adequacy on the basis of the following criteria: a satisfactory imaging of the aneurysm sac and of the stent graft with gray scale, and both color and spectral Doppler scan evaluation for endoleak outside the endograft and within the aneurysm sac.Of the 117 studies, 103 CDUs (88%) and 114 CTs (97%) were recorded as having the presence or the absence of an endoleak and 14 CDUs (12%) and 3 CTs (3%) were indeterminate. For the studies that were recorded to have the presence or the absence of an endoleak, the sensitivity, the specificity, the positive and the negative predictive values, and the accuracy of CDUs as compared with CTs were 97%, 74%, 66%, 98%, and 82%, respectively. Of the 100 CDU videotaped studies available for review, the following results were seen: (1) 93 CDUs had satisfactory B-mode images, (2) 76 had satisfactory color Doppler scan images to evaluate for endoleaks, (3) 55 had color Doppler scan assessment of the entire abdominal aortic aneurysm sac for endoleak, and (4) 27 had spectral Doppler scan waveform confirmation of suspected endoleaks. Only 19 CDU studies (19%) with all 4 criteria for complete assessment of endoleak were performed.Although most of the CDU studies were technically suboptimal, the CDUs reliably identified endoleaks with an excellent sensitivity and a negative predictive value as compared with CT scans.Detection of endoleak with enhanced ultrasound imaging: comparison with biphasic computed tomography.To compare unenhanced and enhanced ultrasound imaging to biphasic computed tomography (CT) in the detection of endoleak after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) repair.Fifty-three patients (44 men; mean age 70 years) were examined during 96 follow-up visits after endovascular AAA repair. All patients had color Doppler and power Doppler ultrasound studies performed before and after the administration of an ultrasound contrast agent. Biphasic (arterial and delayed) CT was performed on the same day, and the ultrasound and CT studies were independently scored to record the presence or absence of endoleak and the level of confidence in the observation.The sensitivity of the ultrasound techniques to detect endoleak improved with the use of ultrasound contrast media, ranging from a low of 12% with unenhanced color Doppler to 50% with enhanced power Doppler. However, the enhanced power Doppler failed to detect 9 type II endoleaks identified by CT (86% negative predictive value for endoleak). There were only 2 graft-related endoleaks in the study; one was diagnosed from the ultrasound image, but the other had nondiagnostic ultrasound scans because of poor views.Ultrasound scanning with or without contrast enhancement was not as reliable as CT in diagnosing type II endoleak. CT imaging remains our surveillance modality of choice.Review of postoperative CT and ultrasound for endovascular aneurysm repair using Talent stent graft: can we simplify the surveillance protocol and reduce the number of CT scans?Simplifying a postoperative surveillance protocol for endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) requires quality control comparing computerized tomography (CT) and ultrasound (US) results of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) diameter measurements and endoleaks.To test if US is comparable to CT, then assess a simplified follow-up with our conventional surveillance to assess patient safety.During 2001-2006, data on 56 patients treated with Talent stent graft were prospectively registered. Median follow-up was 41.5 months (range, 2-94 months), with CT, US, and plain film abdomen X-rays (PFA) at 1, 6, and 12 months, then yearly. Bland-Altman plot was used to assess the agreement between CT and US measuring the AAA diameters and mixed model by the time effect to assess the difference in diameter over time. Sensitivity and specificity for detection of endoleaks by US, with CT as 'gold standard' were calculated. A simplified surveillance protocol with US/PFA at 6 and 8 weeks, CT/US/PFA at 1 year, and yearly US/PFA thereafter, was evaluated. CT was carried out when poor visibility, endoleak detected, AAA diameter increase (≥5 mm) on US or migration (≥10 mm) on PFA. This regime was compared with our conventional follow-up protocol.Diameter measurements on US appear comparable to CT with 91% specificity and 85% sensitivity for endoleaks detected by US. Using the simplified surveillance protocol no endoleaks, migrations, or endotension requiring treatment were overlooked. The simplified protocol generated 53 selective CT scans, avoiding approximately 144 CT scans. If further simplified by omitting the 1-year CT scan, one type II endoleak would be missed with a 1-year delay, eliminating a further 45 CT scans.US appears comparable to CT in the follow-up of Talent stent grafts in our institution. The proposed simplified surveillance protocol seems safe and can lead to a significant reduction in the number of CT scans.Computed tomography and ultrasound in follow-up of patients after endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysm.The purpose of this study was to compare our experience with duplex ultrasonography (US) and computed tomography (CT) for the routine follow-up of patients after endovascular repair (EVAR) of abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA). We reviewed the electronic charts and radiologic exams of the first 125 patients (113 males, 12 females, median age of 76 years, range 48-98 years) with AAA treated by EVAR from June 1996 to November 2001. Our follow-up protocol included serial CT and US at regular intervals after the procedure (before discharge, at 1 month, and then every 6 months). Adequacy of each exam, ability to detect endoleaks, measurements of AAA diameter, and ability to determine graft patency were compared. For endoleak detection, comparison between CT and US was done using CT as the gold standard. A total of 608 exams, 337 CTs and 271 US, were performed 1 day to 5 years after endovascular aneurysm repair; 98% of CT and 74% of US were technically adequate. Contrary to CT, the proportion of adequate US exam was significantly less in patients with higher body mass index (BMI > or = 30 = 54% vs. BMI < 30 = 81%, p < 0.001) and for pre-discharge US compared to the post-discharge US (54% vs. 88%, p = 0.0005). Concurrent scan pairs were obtained in 252 instances in 107 patients (1-8 pairs per patient). Excellent correlation between AAA diameter measured on CT and US was noted (correlation coefficient of 0.9, p < 0.0001). However, agreement was poor. CT anteroposterior (AP) and transverse measurements were on average 2.9 mm (95% limits of agreement = -7 to 13 mm) and 1.8 mm (95% limits of agreement = -9 to 12 mm) greater than US. For AAA diameter change, there was no case of increase AP diameter on CT. However, in 23% (29/128 pairs of sets) of US, an increase in AAA size that could have influenced patient management (> or = 4 mm) was reported despite no change demonstrated on CT. For endoleak detection, sensitivity and specificity of US compared to that of CT was 25% and 89%. Similar sensitivity and specificity were noted when we excluded the first set (25% and 95%), sets done prior to 2000 (30% and 89%), inadequate CT or US scans (31% and 98%), or duplicate sets of results for each patient (28% and 81%). Of the 27 endoleaks missed on US in 17 patients, 2 were type I endoleaks. None of the four endoleaks seen only on US were type I endoleak. US usefulness prior to discharge was reduced by the high rate of inadequate exam, especially in obese patients. Despite the excellent correlation in AAA diameter between US and CT, there was significant disagreement in AAA diameter measurement and diameter change. Sensitivity of nonstandardized US for endoleak was low compared to CT. CT remains our primary imaging study after EVAR, but standardization of post-EVAR US technique may improve its accuracy.Color duplex ultrasonography is insensitive for the detection of endoleak after aortic endografting: a systematic review.To synthesize the available evidence regarding the diagnostic accuracy of color duplex ultrasonography (CDU) versus the accepted gold-standard of contrast-enhanced computed tomography (CT) for the detection and classification of endoleaks after aortic endografting.A systematic search of the literature was conducted using electronic bibliographical databases and other means to gather articles published between 1991 and 2004. Articles were scrutinized against inclusion/exclusion criteria that broadly followed the QUADAS quality assessment guidelines. The results of diagnostic CDU were expressed for each study as a 2x2 contingency table, and summary statistics (sensitivity/specificity with 95% confidence intervals [CI]) were calculated. Pooled and random effects meta-analyses were performed.Eight published studies and 2 unpublished studies from Charing Cross and St. George's Hospitals (711 patients, 1355 paired scans performed > or = 1 month after endografting) were eligible for inclusion. From meta-analyses, the pooled sensitivity of CDU (versus CT as the gold standard) was 69% (95% CI 52% to 87%) and the specificity of CDU was 91% (95% CI 87% to 95%). These parameters did not appear to vary over time when a smaller dataset of 117 patients with 239 paired scans was used to compare CT and CDU specifically at 3, 12, and 24 months after endografting. Endoleak classification data, which was derived from only 5 small studies, indicated that CDU appeared to have better diagnostic accuracy in detecting type I or type III endoleaks compared with type II endoleaks; however, the data were insufficient for statistical analysis.CDU currently does not have sufficient diagnostic accuracy for the detection of all endoleaks in routine clinical practice. The diagnostic accuracy of CDU may improve if type II endoleaks are ignored.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound vs. CT angiography in fenestrated EVAR surveillance: a single-center comparison.To evaluate contrast-enhanced ultrasound (CEUS) as an effective alternative to computed tomographic angiography (CTA) during follow-up after fenestrated endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) of juxtarenal aortic aneurysms.Between January 2008 and April 2011, 62 patients (all men; mean age 72 years) underwent fenestrated EVAR follow-up with both CTA and CEUS. In a retrospective analysis, the first CTA and CEUS postoperative examinations after EVAR were compared for endoleak detection, aneurysm sac diameter, and target vessel patency. The examinations were performed within 30 days of the procedure and the interval between the 2 scans was <7 days. Only fenestrated endografts with up to 3 fenestrations (with or without a scallop) were eligible so that the entire implant could be visualized with standard abdominal ultrasound.The mean diameters of the aneurysm sac were 56.58±8.56 mm with CEUS and 57.70±8.59 mm with CTA. The mean difference in aneurysm sac diameter was -1.13±3.19 mm (95% CI -0.34 to -1.92), with CTA measurements tending to be slightly larger. Bland-Altman plots showed good agreement between the imaging modalities with respect to aneurysm sac diameter (Spearman correlation coefficient r(s)=0.921, p<0.01). Endoleaks were detected by CTA in 7 (11.3%) of 62 patients and by CEUS in 6 (9.7%). In 59 (95.16%) cases, the tests agreed, and their equivalence was confirmed by binomial distribution testing. There was complete agreement between CEUS and CTA in the assessment of target vessels (144/146 patent target arteries; 1 had a significant stenosis and another was thrombosed).CEUS is as accurate as CTA in endoleak detection, abdominal aortic aneurysm diameter measurement, and the evaluation of target vessels during surveillance of fenestrated stent-grafts. Although it cannot yet be proposed as the only imaging modality during follow-up, CEUS could be usefully employed with the self-evident advantage of reducing lifetime exposure to ionizing radiation.Evaluation of abdominal aortic aneurysm after endoluminal treatment: comparison of color Doppler sonography with biphasic helical CT.The purpose of this study is to compare color Doppler sonography with biphasic helical CT in the evaluation of abdominal aortic aneurysms after endovascular repair.Fifty-five patients prospectively underwent both color Doppler sonography and helical CT within 7 days after treatment by endovascular stent-graft. Aneurysmal thrombosis, the patency of the grafts, and the presence of a leak were evaluated in all patients. When a perigraft leak was observed, an attempt was made to identify its origin and outflow vessels. Helical CT was considered the gold standard technique.Helical CT revealed aneurysmal thrombosis in 33 patients and a perigraft leak in 22 patients. In five patients, helical CT detected a small perigraft leak not shown by color Doppler sonography. In three patients with suboptimal examinations, color Doppler sonography revealed a suspected perigraft leak that was not confirmed by helical CT. In these eight patients, the perigraft leak was sealed or no longer observed during follow-up. Compared with enhanced helical CT, the sensitivity and specificity of color Doppler sonography for the diagnosis of a perigraft leak were 77% and 90%, respectively. In seven other patients, helical CT was superior to color Doppler sonography in detecting the origin of the perigraft leak and the outflow vessels. Two iliac artery dissections and one distal migration of the prosthesis were revealed only by helical CT.Although color Doppler sonography may detect substantial perigraft leaks, helical CT is superior for detecting the origin of the perigraft leak, the outflow vessels, and the detection of complications related to the procedure.Comparison of computed tomography and duplex imaging in assessing aortic morphology following endovascular aneurysm repair.Computed tomography (CT) has been used to assess patients following endovascular aneurysm repair to determine the need for secondary endoluminal or operative procedures. This prospective study compared CT and duplex imaging to evaluate aneurysm morphology following endoluminal aortic grafting.Twenty patients were evaluated at regular intervals following successful endoluminal aneurysm repair. CT and duplex scanning were compared in their ability to determine aneurysm and aortic diameter, the presence of perigraft extravasation (endoleaks) and technical defects in the endograft.In 20 patients who were assessed 6 months after operation, duplex imaging identified four endoleaks (two early, two late; one proximal, three distal). In three cases, the aneurysm diameter progressively increased after operation. In patients with a thrombosed aneurysm sac, the aneurysm regressed at a median of 0.40 (range 0.13-0.8) cm per year. The CT findings were similar (median regression 0.43 (range 0-1.0) cm per year), although CT was unable to predict the site of the leak as accurately as duplex imaging. CT demonstrated that the diameter of the juxtarenal aorta increased following endografting.Duplex imaging is a less invasive, less costly alternative to CT in the follow-up of patients after endoluminal aortic surgery. Increase in size of the aneurysm sac following endovascular aneurysm repair strongly suggests the presence of an endoleak.Role of multidetector CT angiography and contrast-enhanced ultrasound in redefining follow-up protocols after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.Contrast-enhanced ultrasonography (CEUS) is an appealing alternative to computed tomography angiography (CTA) for the follow-up of patients who underwent endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (EVAR). We sought to evaluate the accuracy of CEUS compared with a particularly tailored protocol of CTA performed with a 64-row multidetector CT.The study prospectively enrolled 88 consecutive patients for CEUS and CTA imaging during follow-up after EVAR, yielding 142 paired examinations. The outcome is represented by three main goals: identification and characterisation of endoleaks, evaluation of graft patency and measurement of aneurysm diameter. Triple-phase CTA was the gold standard.Sensitivity and specificity of CEUS compared with CTA in endoleak and graft patency evaluation were 91.89% and 100% and 72% and 100%, respectively. A very high correlation between CTA and CEUS diameter measurements was established. CEUS did not appear superior to CTA in endoleak detection, probably because a tailored CTA protocol with a delayed phase (180 s) allows detection of low-flow endoleaks.Patient management was not different following CEUS and CTA results. CTA cannot yet be completely replaced, but several limitations (radiation exposure, contrast agent) encourage redefining the routine follow-up imaging modality. We suggest an algorithm of surveillance alternating CTA and CEUS.Abdominal aortic aneurysm: contrast-enhanced US for missed endoleaks after endoluminal repair.To evaluate contrast material-enhanced ultrasonography (US) for depiction of endoleaks after endovascular abdominal aortic aneurysm repair (or endovascular aneurysm repair [EVAR]) in patients with aneurysm enlargement and no evidence of endoleak.From November 1998 to February 2003, 112 patients underwent EVAR. At follow-up, duplex US and biphasic multi-detector row computed tomographic (CT) angiography were performed. In 10 patients (group A), evident aneurysm enlargement was observed, with no evidence of complications, at both CT angiography and duplex US. Group A patients, 10 men (mean age, 69.6 years +/- 10 [standard deviation]), underwent US after intravenous bolus injection of a second-generation contrast agent, with continuous low-mechanical index (0.01-0.04) real-time tissue harmonic imaging. Group B patients, 10 men (mean age, 71.3 years +/- 8.2) with aneurysm shrinkage and no evidence of complications, and group C patients, 10 men (mean age, 73.2 years +/- 6) with CT angiographic evidence of endoleak, underwent contrast-enhanced US. Digital subtraction angiography (DSA) was performed in groups A and C. Endoleak detection and characterization were assessed with imaging modalities used in groups A-C; at contrast-enhanced US, time of detection of endoleak, persistence of sac enhancement, and morphology of enhancement were evaluated.In group A, contrast-enhanced US depicted one type I, six type II, one type III, and two undefined endoleaks that were not detected at CT angiography. All leakages were characterized by slow and delayed echo enhancement detected at longer than 150 seconds after contrast agent administration. DSA results confirmed findings in all patients; percutaneous treatment was performed. In group B, contrast-enhanced US did not show echo enhancement; in group C, results with this modality confirmed findings at CT angiography and DSA.Contrast-enhanced US depicts endoleaks after EVAR, particularly when depiction fails with other imaging modalities.Computed tomography versus color duplex ultrasound for surveillance of abdominal aortic stent-grafts.To compare the ability of computed tomography (CT) and color duplex ultrasound (CDUS) to detect endoleak and accurately measure aortic aneurysm diameters after endovascular repair.Between February 2000 and October 2004, 178 consecutive patients (156 men; mean age 74 years, range 49-89) were treated with aortic stent-grafts (86 Ancure, 55 AneuRx, and 37 Excluder). The follow-up protocol included serial CT and CDUS at 1 month and every 6 months thereafter. Sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, negative predictive value, and Kappa statistics (kappa) were calculated using CT as the gold standard; Bland-Altman analysis was used to determine the 95% limits of agreement. Paired and unpaired t tests and correlation coefficients were used to compare the methods.Follow-up ranged from 1 to 53 months (mean 16), during which 367 paired CT and CDUS studies were acquired. The mean diameter of the AAA sac after repair was 5.15 cm by CT versus 4.99 cm by CDUS (p=0.07); 93% of paired studies were somewhat similar (<or=5 mm). Mean pre to postoperative AAA size changes throughout follow-up were -0.60 mm for CT versus -0.58 mm for CDUS (p=0.78). Thirty-four (19%) endoleaks were detected (26 early and 8 late). Versus CT, the sensitivity, specificity, positive predictive value, and negative predictive value of CDUS for detecting endoleaks were 68%, 99%, 85%, and 97%, respectively (kappa=0.73). CDUS was more accurate in detecting type I endoleak than type II (88% versus 50%, p=0.046).Although CDUS has good correlation to CT in measuring the size of AAAs, it has a lower sensitivity in detecting endoleak, particularly type II. Therefore, CT scans should remain the primary imaging modality for the diagnosis of endoleak.Contrast-enhanced ultrasound imaging for aortic stent-graft surveillance.To compare unenhanced and enhanced ultrasound imaging to computed tomographic angiography (CTA) or magnetic resonance angiography (MRA) for surveillance of aortic endografts.Thirty consecutive patients (29 men; mean age 69 years, range 50-82) who underwent endovascular aortic aneurysm repair agreed to participate in a follow-up program. Patients underwent CTA (26/30) or MRA (4/30), plain abdominal radiography, and unenhanced and enhanced ultrasound examinations at 3, 12, and 24 months to evaluate aneurysm diameter, endoleaks, and graft patency. The accuracy of ultrasound was compared with CTA or MRA as the reference standards.Twenty-six patients reached the 24-month assessment (mean follow-up 30 months, range 6-60). All endoleaks detected by CTA or MRA were confirmed by enhanced ultrasound; the aneurysm diameter in these patients remained unchanged or increased. In patients without endoleaks on any imaging method, the sac diameter remained unchanged or decreased. Endoleaks disclosed by enhanced ultrasound alone, all type II, numbered 16 at 3 months, 6 at 12 months, and 3 at 24 months. In this group, the aneurysm diameter remained unchanged or increased. Enhanced ultrasound yielded 100% sensitivity in detecting endoleaks, but compared with CTA and MRA, all endoleaks detected by enhanced ultrasound alone were false positives (mean specificity 65%). Nevertheless, because changes in the postoperative aneurysm diameter were similar in patients with endoleaks detectable on CTA/MRA and on enhanced ultrasound ("true positives") and in those with endoleaks detectable only on enhanced ultrasound ("false positives"), some endoleaks were possibly "true positive" results.Enhanced ultrasound is a useful method in the long-term surveillance of endovascular aortic aneurysm repairs, possibly in association with CTA or MRA. Enhanced ultrasound also seems able to identify endoleaks missed by other imaging techniques, but this conclusion awaits further investigation.Use of contrast-enhanced ultrasound in follow-up after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair.To investigate the use of contrast-enhanced ultrasound in the detection of endoleak after endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysm.Eighteen patients underwent follow-up on 20 occasions after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair by arterial-phase contrast-enhanced spiral computed tomography (CT). All patients had unenhanced color Doppler ultrasound and Levovist-enhanced ultrasound on the same day. The ultrasound examinations were reported in a manner that was blind to the CT results. CT was regarded as the gold standard for the purposes of the study.There were three endoleaks shown by CT. Unenhanced ultrasound detected only one endoleak (sensitivity, 33%). Levovist-enhanced ultrasound detected all three endoleaks (sensitivity, 100%). Levovist-enhanced ultrasound indicated an additional six endoleaks that were not confirmed by CT (specificity, 67%; positive predictive value, 33%). In one of these six cases, the aneurysm increased in size, which indicates a likelihood of endoleak. Two of the remaining false-positive results occurred in patients known to have a distal implantation leak at completion angiography.In this small group of patients, contrast-enhanced ultrasound appears to be a reliable screening test for endoleak. The false-positive results with enhanced ultrasound may be due to the failure of CT to detect slow flow collateral pathways. Although the number of patients in this study is small, enhanced ultrasound may be more reliable than CT in detecting endoleak.Duplex ultrasound in aneurysm surveillance following endovascular aneurysm repair: a comparison with computed tomography aortography.Cumulative radiation dose, cost, and increased demand for computed tomography aortography (CTA) suggest that duplex ultrasonography (DU) may be an alternative to CTA-based surveillance. We compared CTA with DU during endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) follow-up.Patients undergoing EVAR had clinical and radiological follow-up data entered in a prospectively maintained database. For the purpose of this study, the gold standard test for endoleak detection was CTA, and an endoleak detected on DU alone was assumed to be a false positive result. DU interpretation was performed independently of CTA and vice versa.One hundred thirty-two patients underwent EVAR, of whom 117 attended for follow-up ranging from six months to nine years (mean, 32 months). Adequate aneurysm sac visualisation on DU was not possible in 1.7% of patients, predominantly due to obesity. Twenty-eight endoleaks were detected in 28 patients during follow-up. Of these, 24 were initially identified on DU (four false negative DU examinations), and eight had at least one negative CTA with a positive DU prior to diagnosis. Twenty-three endoleaks were type II in nature and three of these patients had increased sac size. There was one type I and four type III endoleaks. Two of these (both type III) had an increased sac size. Of 12 patients with increased aneurysm size of 5 mm or more at follow-up, five had an endoleak visible on DU, yet negative CTA and a further five had endoleak visualisation on both DU and CTA. Of six endoleaks which underwent re-intervention, all were initially picked up on DU. One of these endoleaks was never demonstrated on CTA and a further two had at least one negative CTA prior to endoleak confirmation. Positive predictive value for DU was 45% and negative predictive value 94%. Specificity of DU for endoleak detection was 67% when compared with CTA, because of the large number of false positive DU results. Sensitivity for DU was 86%, with all clinically significant endoleaks demonstrated on CTA also detected on DU.Despite its low positive predictive value, we found DU to be a sensitive test for the detection of clinically significant endoleaks. Given concerns about cumulative radiation exposure and cost, and the surprisingly low sensitivity of CTA for endoleak detection in this series, selective CTA based on DU surveillance may be a more appropriate long-term strategy.Color-flow duplex ultrasound scan versus computed tomographic scan in the surveillance of endovascular aneurysm repair.The purpose of this study is to compare both computed tomographic scan (CT) and color flow duplex ultrasound scanning (CDU) as surveillance modalities for clinically significant endoleaks and to evaluate concordance in abdominal aortic aneurysm (AAA) diameter measurements in patients after endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR) in a busy hospital vascular laboratory.We conducted a retrospective review of all patients who underwent endovascular repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms between February 1996 and November 2002 and had same-day CT and CDU studies. Ninety-seven patients enrolled in phase II clinical studies of Ancure devices had long-term follow-up with both modalities. The other patients underwent simultaneous studies, usually only at the 1-month postoperative visit. Peripheral vascular studies were performed by two certified vascular technicians; all CT scans were reviewed by one vascular surgeon. CT was used as the standard against which the sensitivity, specificity, negative predictive value, and positive predictive value of CDU in endoleak detection was determined. Statistics were performed by using the paired t test; a P value <.05 was considered significant. Kappa statistic was used to assess the correlation between CDU and CT in identifying endoleaks. The correlation between CT and CDU in AAA size measurements as well as in serial size measurements was also determined.Four hundred ninety-five same-day CT and CDU examinations were reviewed in 281 patients. Patients had an average follow-up of 34.6 months (range, 1 to 72 months). Thirty-five leaks were identified among the patients studied (12.4% overall). In comparison with CT, diagnosis of endoleak with ultrasound scanning was associated with a sensitivity of 42.9%, specificity of 96.0%, positive predictive value of 53.9%, and negative predictive value of 93.9%. The correlation between the two modalities was modest (kappa statistic 0.427). The minor axis transverse diameter as measured by ultrasound and CT scans (4.81 +/- 1.1 cm on CT and 4.55 +/- 1.1 cm on ultrasound) correlated closely (r =.93, P <.001.) Seventy percent of paired studies differed by < or =5 mm. Changes in aneurysm size throughout follow-up were -.29 +/-.71 cm on CT scan -.34 +/-.57 cm on duplex ultrasound scan. The correlation coefficient was.65 (P <.001). There was no significant difference in the change as measured by either modality on the paired t test.Although CDU demonstrates a high degree of correlation with CT scan in determining aneurysm size change over time, it has a low sensitivity and positive predictive value in endoleak detection. In the hospital vascular laboratory at a large tertiary care center, CDU cannot effectively replace CT scan in surveillance after EVAR.Duplex ultrasound evaluation of endoluminally treated aortic aneurysms with emphasis on diameter measurement: A comparison with computed tomography.The aim of this study was to determine the accuracy of color Doppler ultrasound (CDUS) for endoleak detection and measurement of the aneurysm diameter after endovascular aortic aneurysm repair.Forty-eight CDUS and computed tomographic angiography (CTA) examinations performed concurrently on 29 patients who were treated with endovascular stent grafts for abdominal aortic aneurysms were included in the study. CTA and CDUS findings were retrospectively compared for aneurysm diameter, patency of the graft, and the presence of leaks in the aneurysm's lumen (the so-called "endoleaks").The stent graft was patent in all patients. Including the follow-up examinations, endoleaks were detected in a total of 17 CTA studies. The sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive values for CDUS compared with CTA as the gold standard were 100%, 96%, 94.4%, and 100%, respectively. Kappa statistics showed a high level of agreement between CDUS ant CTA examinations (χ = 0.95). The aneurysm diameters measured with CDUS and CTA were significantly different, but within 5 mm of each other in 83% of patients.Provided that a strict CDUS protocol including spectral analysis of perigraft flow is used, CDUS is comparable to CTA for endoleak detection and measurement of the aneurysm diameter.Surveillance after EVAR based on duplex ultrasound and abdominal radiography.Computed tomography angiography (CTA) is considered the gold standard imaging technique for surveillance following endovascular aneurysm repair (EVAR). Limitations of CTA include cost, risk of contrast nephropathy and radiation exposure. A modified surveillance protocol involving annual duplex ultrasound (DUS) and abdominal radiography (AXR) was introduced, with CTA performed only if abnormalities were identified or DUS was undiagnostic.Prospective records were maintained on patients undergoing infra-renal EVAR at a UK, tertiary referral centre. All patients enrolled with at least one-year follow-up were reviewed. Primary outcomes identified were aneurysm rupture and aneurysm-related complications. Secondary outcomes included number of CTAs avoided and cost.Median follow-up was 36 months (range 12-57) for 194 patients. The total number of sets of surveillance imaging was 412 of which 70 (17%) required CTA. Abnormalities were found in 30 patients, 18 confirmed by CTA. Eleven patients required secondary intervention, three initially identified by AXR, three by DUS, three by both DUS and AXR, and two by CTA following undiagnostic DUS. No patient presented with rupture or aneurysm-related complications not identified by modified surveillance. Mean annual savings were €223.EVAR surveillance based on DUS and AXR is feasible and safe. The complimentary nature of AXR and DUS is demonstrated.Follow-up evaluation of endoluminally treated abdominal aortic aneurysms with duplex ultrasonography: validation with computed tomography.A growing number of patients with abdominal aortic aneurysms are currently being offered endoluminal treatment. However, the incidence of endoleaks, stenosis, and thrombosis is around 25% to 30%. As a result, a strict post procedure imaging surveillance protocol is necessary. The purpose of this study was to compare duplex ultrasonography (DU) and computed tomography (CT) for the follow-up of endoluminally treated aortic aneurysms.A total of 89 patients were followed up with serial CT and DU at 1, 3, 6, 12, and 24 months after endoluminal treatment. Special attention was directed toward the presence of endoleaks and aneurysm diameter evolution. Preoperative CT and DU were also reviewed to assess aneurysm diameter correlation.With DU, 14 type I and 21 type II endoleaks were identified. In one case the DU did not visualize a type II endoleak present on CT, and CT did not confirm three type II leaks identified with DU. There was only one false positive for type I endoleak with DU. The sensitivity of DU was 96% with a specificity of 94%, when compared with CT. A linear regression analysis of the diameters obtained with DU and CT revealed a good correlation. However, variability was high, indicating poor agreement. Regarding diameter evolution, the range was identical in 45%, and the trend was similar in 73%. However, in 9% of the cases, DU showed a decrease in diameter, whereas CT showed a significant increase.DU is an accurate tool for the diagnosis of endoleaks, but is less valuable for diameter measurements, when compared with CT. Currently, DU is a useful tool, but CT remains a key part of the postoperative evaluation after endoluminal treatment of abdominal aortic aneurysms. At institutions where DU is used for follow-up, researchers should perform quality control studies to avoid potentially significant errors.